Title
Review for Summer of Sam (1999)
Number of Reviews
33

Author
Marty Mapes
***1/2 (out of 4) NOTE: SUMMER OF SAM IS RATED R FOR LOTS OF SEX AND A
LITTLE GORE, SOME OF WHICH WILL BE DISCUSSED IN THIS REVIEW. READ AT
YOUR OWN RISK. 
When it comes to evoking a time and place, nobody is better than Spike
Lee. In DO THE RIGHT THING, he created an entire neighborhood and a
memorable, palpable couple of days. In SUMMER OF SAM, Lee does it again.
Moreover, the interesting racial and ethical gray areas that spangled DO
THE RIGHT THING, add texture to this movie.
SUMMER OF SAM is set in the Bronx, New York, in the summer of 1977, one
of the hottest summers on record. It was also the summer that the
so-called "Son of Sam" serial killer was on the loose. Fear of the
serial killer (so the movie says) forever defines that time and place.
Lee is often an impressionist filmmaker. He'll try to capture a moment
in time. Small details, like a "Dead End" sign, or a heat wave, or a
serial killer in the headlines really aren't that important to the plot,
but are essential to definition of time and place. And even WITHIN the
movie, Lee highlights a particular moment with an oddly-chosen image
(like when he shows the space BETWEEN two characters, rather than the
characters themselves) or with expressionistic lighting and effects
(i.e., effects that reflects the characters' inner moods, rather than
external reality).
So although the Son of Sam killer (now know to be David Berkowitz,
played by Michael Badalucco) is in this movie, his role is small. This
is not a horror movie about a serial killer. Rather, it is an ensemble
drama. The serial killings touch the lives of the characters, but only
indirectly as future memories.
The movie's center is Vinnie (John Leguizamo, proving himself to be a
talented actor), a small-time hairdresser. Vinnie is married to Dionna
(Mira Sorvino) and the two make a handsome couple.
Their sex life is busy, but troubled. Vinnie likes all kinds of sex, but
he believes that he can only have "normal" sex with his wife. She, on
the other hand, would like to please him however she can, and so both of
them end up unsatisfied and frustrated.
In many movies, dialogue about, and depiction of their sex life would be
gratuitous, but in SUMMER OF SAM, it really drives the characters' words
and actions. Without it, we wouldn't know who the characters are or why
their relationship is as troubled as it is.
Vinnie also hangs around with his old buddies from the neighborhood.
Joey (Michael Rispoli) and his three pals can almost always be found at
the dead end, peddling drugs and discussing the issues of the day. Their
machismo makes for some of the movie's funniest conversations. Everyone
has to be the smartest and the loudest, which sometimes makes for a
conversation where everyone is talking and nobody is listening. It's a
bit of insightful writing and directing by Lee.
Vinnie's friend Richie re-emerges into the neighborhood with a Sid
Vicious hairdo, a British-flag t-shirt, and an English-punk accent. Once
they recognize him, Richie is still allowed to be "one of the guys," but
just barely. Vinnie still likes him because they go way back. Joey's
gang tolerates him because he's a paying customer.
But his appearances aren't all that has changed (or should I say
emerged?). When Richie needs money, he dances at a gay strip bar, then
gets a few extra "tips" back stage. He has a girlfriend, but their
relationship is more platonic than she'd like.
So when Joey's gang finds out about Richie's homosexuality, (added to
his weird behavior & appearance) they decide that he must be the Son of
Sam killer. One night they drive over to the punk club where they think
he'll be.
The contrast between the cultures is huge: four Italian street toughs
among a club full of pierced, mohawked, leathered punks. Perhaps the
epitome of that contrast is the image of Vinnie in his disco best,
talking over old times with Richie in his new blond mohawk. The
conversation soon becomes an argument, Vinnie accusing Richie of having
changed so much and Richie saying he's just being himself. Both of them
are as right and as honest as they've been in the whole movie. Yet their
perspectives are so different that it seems like they're just fighting.
Neither can see the other's point of view, which really sums up the
tragedy of the whole Jocks-vs.-Goths war.
In a classic enactment of that war, Joey's gang forms a posse to go take
care of Richie, once and for all. They've learned he's at home tonight,
and they're off to make him pay. For a moment, it seems like they know
what they're doing is wrong. They hesitate. Their revenge requires some
moral legitimacy, so they decide to make Vinnie come along and be a part
of their mob. Vinnie is so messed up from problems with his wife and
from alcohol and drugs that he gives in to their pressure.
The dreadful march of the vigilantes is tensely intercut with the
triumphant capture of the real Son of Sam killer. The appropriately
grave score (from Terrence Blanchard) and well-chosen song (The Who's
WON'T GET FOOLED AGAIN) bring the movie to its grim, yet hopeful close.
Spike Lee is a great director. He is one of the best when it comes to
pulling great performances from a large cast, and when it comes to
creating a real, palpable impression of a moment. He has made his share
of bad movies, but when he's on his mark, he is very good. SUMMER OF SAM
will surely be remembered among the best. 
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.moviehabit.com

Author
Dennis Schwartz

SUMMER OF SAM (director/writer: Spike Lee; screenwriters:Victor
Colicchio /Michael Imperioli; cinematographer: Ellen Kuras; cast: John
Leguizamo (Vinny), Adrien Brody (Ritchie), Mira Sorvino (Dionna),
Jennifer Esposito (Ruby), Michael Rispoli (Joey T), Bebe Neuwirth
(Gloria), Patti LuPone (Helen), Mike Starr (Eddie), Anthony LaPaglia
(Detective Lou Petrocelli), Roger Guenveur Smith (Detective Curt
Atwater), Ben Gazarra (Luigi, mafia kingpin), Jimmy Breslin (himself),
Michael Badalucco (Son of Sam), Spike Lee (John Jeffries), John Turturro
(voice of Harvey the Black Dog), 1999)
Spike Lee's take on the the summer of 1977 in New York City, a time when
a serial killer was on the loose, causing a panic by killing couples in
lovers lane. The film has its rewarding moments to counter its muddled
attempt to cover what actually happened. David Berkowitz, the Son of
Sam, was eventually apprehended due to a parking ticket that was traced
to him.
But Spike is not that concerned with the serial killer, his perspective
of the event is how it influenced an Italian Bronx neighborhood,
bringing out its paranoia. The most interesting character in the film is
not David Berkowitz, but Vinny (Leguizamo) from the Bronx, a
hairdresser, someone of a working-class mentality and someone who is
possessed with a weak character. He is also someone who has adapted to
his neighborhood's provincial attitudes, trusting only Italians who
think like he does. It is through his tortured eyes that the viewer sees
how a lynch mob mentality unfolds in a neighborhood, how sexually
repressed the Catholic is, and how God is seen as someone who will make
you pay for your sins. Vinny's sins are due to his repressions, refusing
to have oral sex with his wife because his wife shouldn't do such
things. He has oral sex on his extra-marital affairs, which is his
excuse for having the affairs. He was almost the target of the serial
killer on the night he made it with his wife's cousin and is now
guilt-ridden and thinks he has to change his ways, that God gave him one
more chance by sparing his life in favor of the other couple that was
killed that night.
It was at times a film that bordered on greatness, but then for long
stretches turned back into a mess, filled with untenable stereotypes of
the Italians, while losing track of its story about the psycho
..44-Caliber Killer. It suffered from being too long (142 minutes), from
failing to say anything relevant about the Son of Sam, and from being
too ambitious. Son of Sam was unintentionally portrayed in a comic
manner as he was madly talking to a barking black dog named Harvey,
suffering from fits of ranting to himself, and hearing delusionary
voices. Michael Badalucco's characterization added nothing to the story
except disappointment that his character wasn't even attempted to be
explored. He was a caricature; we know nothing more about him from this
film than the New Yorkers did from the police sketches of him placed in
the newspapers to identify him.
Summer of Sam concentrates its energy on two young Italian-American
couples from the Bronx. The first couple is married for two years:
Dionna (Mira) is a waitress in her father's Italian restaurant; Vinny is
her philandering husband, who can't stop himself from cheating on her.
They both share a love for disco and the night-life. The second couple
is made up of two lost souls who don't quite fit into the neighborhood
but haven't been able to get away from the neighborhood. Ritchie (Brody)
has just returned from England to live with his mother (Patti LuPone)
and new step-father (Mike Starr), who upset him greatly by kicking him
out of the house to live in the garage. He has returned with an
affective accent imitative of the Sex Pistols, with spiked hair, and
wearing a dog collar. The local girl he befriends is named Ruby
(Jennifer Esposito), better known on the street as Ruby the Skank. She
joins Ritchie into forming a punk-rock duo--providing a contrast to the
disco marriage of Dionna and Vinny's. Ritchie also has a secret life as
a male performer in a gay theater on 42nd St. known as Male World and
turning gay tricks to get some money to buy an expensive guitar. When
this news hits the neighborhood, it is too much for the locals to
handle, even his best friend Vinny turns against him. All the male leads
seem to lead inexplicable double lives.
The film derives its verve from the Daily News headlines of the mounting
number of couples killed by the serial killer that summer. We hear Phil
Rizzuto covering the Yankee championship baseball season on radio and
the team's star, Reggie Jackson, is amusingly connected by one of the
neighborhood boys to the killings because his uniform number is 44.
Jimmy Breslin fills us in on the Daily News coverage, where he was a
reporter at that time, even receiving a letter from Son of Sam. Spike
acts as a black TV reporter who is pleasing to the white audience (in a
performance that proves he has no ability as an actor). There is a Con
Ed blackout in the record hot summer days of July, which causes looting
in Harlem, while in contrast, the local mafia chiefs keep the white
neighborhood looter-free.
Much like in Fritz Lang's M, as the police are baffled by the killer and
go to the underworld to get help, here they will go to Luigi (Gazzara),
who is the local mafia chief. He puts up a reward to get the killer and
then puts together a list of those he suspects might be the pervert.
Added to the mix of those on the look out for the Son of Sam, are the
local Italian wiseguys, who hang out by a sign that says Dead-End. Joey
T (Rispoli) is the tough leader of this group, a low-level drug dealer
who has a daughter and tries to keep his neighborhood free of social
undesirables, yet is completely unconscious that what he is doing is
paradoxical. Vinny and Ritchie are part of the group as youngsters
growing up, but trouble arises when the group suspects Ritchie of
changing so much that he could be the Son of Sam. Meanwhile, Vinny's
life seems to be unraveling and he is too confused and drugged up to
understand what is going on. It seems as if he in a clash over
pop-cultures (disco and punk) with his best friend Ritchie.
It's a messy film, moving in many different directions, but it is filled
with ideas and is always engaging. The lead performers Leguizamo, Brody,
Esposito, Sorvino, and Rispoli give crisp performances. Leguizamo's
performance is special in a visceral way, it exposes his double-standard
life and his lowlife mindset, his rage is what the film keys in on. The
film doesn't really come to a climax or say anything new about society
at large, but it has an excitement of its own that is grandiose. That's
about as complimentary as I can get about a film that should be praised
more than it should be lambasted for its faults. It should be praised
for showing how scared people are of those who are different and how
they need to blame someone for what they don't understand. The scene
near the end of the film was particularly violent and revolting, giving
the film the jolt it needed to make its case about those who are narrow
minded.
This was not a film, after all, about the killer, its victims, or about
the summer of 1977, it was a film about those who were victimized
because they are made into scapegoats for someone else's problems that
they can't face themselves. It is a film about urban white people of
Italian origin: their fears, their angers, their prejudices, their
repressions, and their eroticisms. Spike Lee (Do the Right Thing) keeps
the African-American view to the summer of 1977 down to the bare
minimum. He shows the killings of Son of Sam in their gruesome aspects,
but that is not the only horror going on in the city, therefore little
is made of the serial killings. It almost seems as if the story about
the Son of Sam was not even needed. This was a film almost exclusively
about an Italian neighborhood and their xenophobia, and it could have
taking place in any year after 1950.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Mac VerStandig
A powerful and unforgettable film, Spike Lee's Summer of Sam is, to 
date, the best drama of 1999. The chief feature of the production is its 
background setting, one so intriguing that it is capable of being an 
entire plot: New York City in the summer of 1977. By adding a 
fictionalized subplot putting several characters under a magnifying 
glass, the film is able to not only use these rich events, but a study 
of human paranoia resulting from them as well. The movie uses these 
great settings and shockingly forthright violence to tie these plots 
together so well.
In the summer of 1977 New York City had a heat wave bringing 
temperatures well over 100 degrees, the Yankees were on there way to a 
world series victory led by Reggie Jackson's three dramatic home runs, 
a blackout occurred that put the city that never sleeps in a zombie-like 
state for days, and the city's first genuine serial killer, David 
Berkowitz, calling himself "Son of Sam," roamed the streets preying on 
innocent young women.
As the temperatures rise, and the body count increases, a certain 
insanity comes about the city that is only further stimulated by the 
other events. Spike Lee's fictionalized group of characters from the 
Bronx, led by Vinny (John Leguizamo) slowly fall victim to the paranoia 
that a serial killer presents, and seek a scapegoat to reassure 
themselves of their safety. Using fractured logic they reach the 
conclusion that this murderer, whoever he may be, must be from their 
neighborhood. So a list of everyone they consider to be a weird-o is 
drawn up, and at the top of their list is aspiring punk rocker Ritchie 
(Adrien Brody) who soon becomes the subject of continuous persecution 
from the group.
Son of Sam (Michael Badalucco) actually has less than 15 minutes of 
screen time in this production. The time that he is on screen proves to 
be some of the most horrifying and frightening moments of the entire 
film. Every murder he commits during the movie is shown with explicit 
detail for a period of time just long enough to make it sink real deep 
inside of you. Not once during any of these beautifully choreographed 
murders do you see the killer's face, just those of people realizing 
that they are about to lose their lives.
Summer of Sam also features a strong sexual content aside from the 
violence and obvious use of foul language. Several scenes focus on 
conversations regarding oral sex techniques, and styles. One scene 
includes three-way sexual activities. Being that a subplot of marriage 
problems with Vinny and his wife (Mira Sorvino) comes about, this 
otherwise excessive sexual content is actually a building block of the 
film's excellence.
The production includes an incredible panoply of background settings and 
musical pieces. Scenes range from the streets of New York to Studio 54, 
with music from groups like ABBA to Elton John. The film also uses a 
delightful contrast technique using upbeat music as the murders take 
place, creating an incredible chill.
When David Berkowitz announced that he had received orders to kill from 
a dog, people were equally shocked and amused. He had been a strong 
presence in New York City for over a year, and that was his reasoning. 
Comparatively, Summer of Sam is both shocking and entertaining, making 
it a strong presence and great film at the same time.

Author
Steve Rhodes
In SUMMER OF SAM, Spike Lee uses the hunt for serial killer David
Birkowitz, a.k.a., "the Son of Sam," as an unlikely backdrop to tell a
slice-of-life story about one of New York's boroughs, the Bronx.  Set in
1977, the story ponders issues from sexuality to the hatred of those who
look different.
Packed with way too many characters, subplots and small talk, the movie
is in bad need of major pruning.  Still, the best parts can be quite
intriguing.
Mira Sorvino, in a sympathetic and moving performance, steals the show
as Dionna, a lovely wife who tries her best to support her cheating
husband, Vinny (John Leguizamo).  Vinny runs around on his wife every
chance he gets since he has wild sex with his paramours.  With his wife,
he insists on doing it in a standard position and always with the lights
off, otherwise he figures it would be a sin.  She is quite willing to
have sex anyway he wants, but he hates her for his inhibitions about
conjugal relations.
(The movie, without benefit of the digital fig leaves in EYES WIDE SHUT,
explores some of the same issues.  Here the scenes are much more
explicit, and there is significant violence as well, but this film too
is rated R.  So much for the EYES WIDE SHUT rating controversy.  Go
figure.)
Adrien Brody plays Vinny's buddy, a punk rocker named Ritchie, who
sports a series of strange haircuts and bizarre clothing choices.
Ritchie is a bisexual who picks up money by dancing and turning tricks
at a sleazy, gay strip bar.
As the canonical, pasta-loving godfather Luigi, Ben Gazzara sets his
goons loose on the neighborhood to find Son of Sam.  Michael Rispoli
plays Joey T, a middle-age divorcé, who is a small time drug dealer.  He
and his buddies follow Luigi's command by drawing up a list of suspects.
As you can guess, Ritchie appears prominent on the list.
Overlaid over the story is a thick score full of melancholy.  Lee
includes video clips and references to the period, like the 1977
blackout, to give the movie a strong sense of time and place.
Even Jimmy Breslin shows up to play himself in the pair of narrations
that bracket the film.  In the opening he gives a version of the quote
that opened the old television series, "The Naked City."  "There were 8
million stories in the Naked City, and this was one of them," he tells
us as if to say, New York isn't all this bad.  In the ending, he says,
"New York is the city I love and hate equally."  Perhaps those filled
with New York nostalgia will forgive the film for its meandering pace
and loss of focus.  People outside of the five boroughs, on the other
hand, may feel like Breslin.  This is a movie to love and hate equally.
SUMMER OF SAM runs too long at 2:21.  It is rated R for strong graphic
violence and sexuality, pervasive strong language and drug use and would
be acceptable for teenagers only if they are older and mature.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Greg King
SUMMER OF SAM (R).  
(Touchstone/Buena Vista International)
Director: Spike Lee
Stars: John Leguizamo, Adrien Brody, Mira Sorvino, Jennifer Esposito,
Michael Rispoli, Anthony LaPaglia, Saverio Guerra, Brian Tarantino, Al
Pagalonia, Ken Garito, Bebe Neuwirth, Patti LuPone, Mike Starr, Roger
Guenveur Smith, Ben Gazarra, Michael Badalucco, Jimmy Breslin, John
Savage, Joe Lisi, James Reno, Arthur Nascarella, Spike Lee, voice of
John Turturro
Running time: 131 minutes.
This controversial, disturbing and visually stylish new film
from Spike Lee is certainly not for the faint hearted.  Dealing with
the killing spree of David Berkowitz, dubbed the Son of Sam, during
the hot summer of 1977, this uncompromising film is something of a
return to form for Lee, whose last couple of films have lacked impact,
and have even failed to secure a release in this country.  But Summer
of Sam is no mere police procedural depicting the intense
investigation to track down the killer, who later claimed that he was
ordered to kill by his neighbour's barking dog.  Rather, Summer Of Sam
recalls Lee's superb Do The Right Thing, which explored how events
reverberate throughout a neighbourhood, like a rock thrown into a pool
sends out ever increasing ripples that disturb the smooth surface.
Lee beautifully evokes the heat and steamy tension of New York
during that unforgettable summer, characterised by an unusual heat
wave.  Real life events from the time are also woven into the
narrative, giving a sense of authenticity.  Lee captures feverish
Saturday nights spent dancing in hip discos, the palpable sense of
fear that permeated the neighbourhood with Sam stalking the streets,
the sweaty heat wave, and the deep seated suspicions and tensions that
upset an otherwise close knit Italian American community.
John Leguizamo (the awful Spawn, etc) gives a career best
performance here as Vinny, a swaggering and macho Brooklyn
hairdresser, whose marital infidelities finally catch up with during
that fateful summer.  Sex, drugs and an increasingly chaotic lifestyle
soon take their toll on Vinny, and creates a rift between him and his
long suffering wife Dionna (Oscar winner Mira Sorvino).  His best
friend is Ritchie (Adrien Brody, recently seen in the star studded The
Thin Red Line, etc), who proudly struts around the neighbourhood
sporting his new look, heavily influenced by the British new wave of
punk rock, much to the chagrin of his buddies who profess a far more
reserved and traditional outlook.  But as Sam's killing spree
continues, fear and suspicion soon permeate the neighbourhood.
Vigilante gangs form, the mob offers a hefty reward, and some outraged
citizens take the law into their own hands, targeting those whose
behaviour they view as suspicious.  Soon Vinny and Ritchie find
themselves on a violent and nasty collision course that will forever
taint their friendship.
Summer Of Sam is a very violent and confronting film, and Lee
sails close to the wind with his recreation of both a time and a place
that has left some very deep psychological scars.  The scenes dealing
with Sam have a gritty intensity and palpable sense of madness to
them, and Lee gives these sequences a bizarre, almost surreal touch
that sometimes jars with the other elements of the film.  Lee has
bathed the film in hits from the '70's, which creates a nostalgic mood
for many in the audience.  But rather than merely using the music as
an accessory on which to hang the obligatory soundtrack album, Lee
carefully integrates the songs into the structure and fabric of the
Somehow he has married two vastly different story strands into
what is largely a nostalgic look at the glory days of disco.  It's
almost as if Son of Sam had wandered into Saturday Night Fever and
started blasting away at random!  Lee also cleverly bookends the
narrative with a monologue from Jimmy Breslin, the former reporter who
wrote the definitive book on the Son of Sam killings, which gives the
material a nicely ironic touch.
Performances throughout are quite solid, with The Practice's
Michael Badalucco, cast against type, delivering a rather intense
performance as the driven killer.  Sorvino is also strong as Dionna,
who finally summons up the courage and strength to leave her
philandering husband.  One weak link is Lee himself, who gives a very
wooden and uncomfortable performance as a television journalist
attempting to seek out community responses to the murder spree.
Lee uses a lot of his usual cinematic tricks to give the film
an idiosyncratic look and feel, but Summer Of Sam will test the
patience and stamina of many within the audience.  As strong and as
compelling as Summer Of Sam may be, though, one is left with the
overwhelming impression that the definitive film exploring the Son of
Sam killings has yet to be made!
  
**1/2
greg king
http://www.netau.com.au/gregking

Author
Holly Baublitz
Personally, I am a horror-movie fan. However, being a true movie
buff, I see just about every new release that comes out. When I heard
about "Summer of Sam" I thought it would be a good "shock factor" movie.
Then I had second thoughts.. I have never cared much for Spike Lee's
movies, especially how they all seem to be laced with racial undertones,
sometimes unnecessarily, at times. But, I went with my father, who went
simply for the "shock factor" thinking it was going to be a "bloody
movie about the killings".
I will admit, it was quite bloody. The murder scenes are shown and
they aren't in any way made easy or glorified. However, the movie is not
based on the murderer, the murders or the victims. The victims names
aren't even mentioned at all that I can remember in the movie, and,
although the murderer is portrayed, he isn't the basis of the movie. The
movie is more about society around the time of the murders, and the
murders and killings are simply a backdrop for a story about a group of
friends growing up in New York. John Leguizamo plays one of the main
"tough guys", portraying a young husband to Mira Sorvino that you can't
help but hate and feel sorry for at the same time. Sorvino is absolutely
star-struck in this movie, looking wonderful as ever but also giving a
performance that makes you feel for her as well as her situation. The
one car scene, in which she is accusing her husband, Leguizamo, of
cheating on her with her cousin is absolutely amazing, one which drew
applause from the audience of the theater in which I was in. I know I
was cheering for her. You GO, Girl!
The murderer is in no way glorified. He is portrayed as a sick,
psychotic man who, even in this movie, is not clear as to why he is
killing except for the fact that he is seriously messed up in the head.
The movie deals with the prejudices of the area and time, with the
"tough guys" of the neighborhood thinking they can go out and
single-handedly find the .44 caliber killer with their own brains and
"process of elimination". It deals with society and it has a story
simply backlogged by the horrible events of the murders. At the end, of
course, the murderer is caught, but that isn't the end of the movie.
Without giving away the end, let's just say that you leave the movie
with a sense of relief that the sick psycho was caught, but another
feeling of dread that there is such harsh prejudice in this world that
some people cannot see past appearances... even when it comes to their
own friends.
Spike Lee overlooked the racial proponents of his past films and,
although a slight racial slur in the middle of the movie during the
"black out riot news report", there is more to his movie than race for
once. It is NOT a shock-film, but a combination of a great script,
cinematography and acting which, put all together in a nut-shell, ended
up to be a great story placed in a not-so-great time in history. If war
films can be made and films can be made about families living in the
time of World War I or II, this can be equivelent to it.. it's simply
about a group of people living through a very frightening and scary
point in our history. Granted, it wasn't a very happy time, but neither
was the Invasion of Normandy and Speilberg didn't get any flack about
his "Saving Private Ryan". Lee.. Good job. Keep it up, and I applaud you
for doing this movie with taste and respect. It came out to be, in my
mind, a real eye opener and a work of art. !!!!

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Spike Lee decides to take a novel route through his latest joint, foregoing
his usual emphasis on the lives of African-Americans, and instead, taking a
deep plunge into the mishmash of activity in the late 70s of New York City.
The "Son of Sam" serial killer, the Italian neighborhood caught in its
paranoiac frenzy, the burgeoning punk rock scene, the New York Yankees and
their bid for the Championship, the last days of disco, and well, what
else...love.
PLOT:
This film takes a look at a certain group of people in an Italian
neighborhood during one of New York City's most turbulent times. The year
was 1977 and the "Son of Sam" serial killer was on the loose. Meanwhile, a
husband cheats on his wife, a good ol' Italian boy turns punk and turns
tricks to support his music career, the police ask the Mob for help catching
the killer, while the rest of the Italian boys scratch out their own list of
suspects.
CRITIQUE:
A slice of life movie. This film is not for everyone, and will most
certainly not be enjoyed by those who go in expecting a serial killer
thriller, or a story told via the traditional trajectory. This movie is for
those folks who enjoy an authentic look back at a time and place in life, a
story full of rich characters, a delectable shooting style reminiscent of
films like GOODFELLAS (10/10) and BOOGIE NIGHTS (8/10), a lively and
appropriate soundtrack, and a superb cast of actors banging out their
greatest thespian hits. I personally believe that this film represents John
Leguizamo's finest work on film yet, with a terrific portrayal of a man
being torn apart by his respect of tradition and his more primitive
yearnings. Adrien Brody plays another great character, managing to capture
all of Ritchie's punk-rock attitude and bravado, with plenty of charm and
humanity, to register his person as one to care about.
On the down side, I think that the film could've been chopped down by twenty
minutes or so, and certainly been improved upon if the distracting
appearance of Spike Lee as a nerdy reporter, had been left on the cutting
room floor. Having said that, Spike the director has stylistically outdone
himself with this picture, playing with everything from the lights, to the
film stock, to the quick cuts to the camera angles...Oliver Stone beware! I
personally have always been a sucker for style and an interesting story told
by the point of view of lively and authentic characters. In fact, the "Son
of Sam" killer angle in this film is simply a backdrop to the proceedings of
these people's lives. An external stimulus mixed in to add paranoia to their
overflowing vat of personal issues in the hot, dirty summer of New York
City. This film managed to make me feel like I was there during that period.
Feel the music, smell the piss on the floor, see the craziness. If you want
to know more about the killer, then this film certainly ain't for you, but
if you want to bask in a couple of hours plus of interesting characters
dealing with real issues during a serial killer frenzy in the late 1970s of
New York City, a groovy soundtrack and a visual style that never lets you
get bored for a second, try this one on for size! It's sure to fit just
right.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The real "Son of Sam" (David Berkowitz) converted to Christianity about 11
years ago, and maintains his own Web site out of jail:
http://www.inetworld.net/hutrcc/david.htm
Mira Sorvino's part of "Dionna" in this film was originally given to
Jennifer Esposito, but she had to take a different part as "Ruby" when
scheduling conflicts prevented her from taking the lead.
Screenwriter Michael Imperioli also acts in this picture. You may also
remember him from one of his most infamous roles as "Spider" from Martin
Scorsese's classic mob tale GOODFELLAS (10/10), in which he gets shot in the
foot by the Joe Pesci character. He also plays a character named Christopher
on TV's "The Sopranos" who, in tribute to his earlier role, shoots someone
else in the foot. Ironically, co-screenwriter Victor Collichio also had a
part in GOODFELLAS, as one of Henry's 80s crew.
John Leguizamo claims that he is actually a better dancer than the film
portrays, since he had to wear high-heeled shoes for his dancing scenes with
Mira Sorvino, because the filmmakers felt as though their size discrepancy
was an issue. Leguizamo didn't really care about the size difference. He's
5'5", she's 5'11".
Leguizamo was born in Bogotá, Colombia, and moved to America with his family
when he was four. He was accepted into Lee Strasberg's Actors Studio and
studied with the master for one day before Strasberg died.
The staple white guy in most Spike Lee films, John Turturro, makes a
surreptitious appearance in this film as well. Listen closely, and you may
just recognize his voice as that of the dog which speaks to the "Son of Sam"
character at some point in the movie.
Mira Sorvino is a babe who has degree from Harvard University, speaks fluent
Mandarin Chinese and once dated video-store clerk turned into director
extraordinaire Quentin Tarantino,
Boxing champion Evander Holyfield has a two-bit part as a "man in riot"
during one scene, while screenwriters Victor Collichio and Michael Imperioli
both make appearances as the characters of "Chickie" and "Midnight"
respectively.
Retired Det. Richard Paul was the Technical Advisor on this film. He was
involved in the first "Son of Sam" homicide. This film was originally titled
THE SON OF SAM.

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Spike Lee.
Cast: John Leguizamo, Adrien Brody, Mira Sorvino, Ben Gazzara, Jennifer 
Esposito, Michael Rispoli, Bebe Neuwirth, Anthony LaPaglia, Mike Starr, Patti 
LuPone, Ken Garito, Brian Tarantino, Roger Guenveur Smith, Michael Badalucco, 
Spike Lee, Jimmy Breslin; voice of John Turturro.
1999 - 144 minutes
Rated R (for graphic violence, strong profanity, sex, nudity, and gore).
Reviewed July 3, 1999.
Spike Lee has always been an obviously talented director, creating inventive 
storytelling and technical techniques that have been nothing short of 
impressive. 1989's critically-heralded "Do the Right Thing" is still Lee's 
most praised work, but he has also made the successful likes of 1991's 
"Jungle Fever," 1992's "Malcolm X," 1994's "Crooklyn," and 1995's "Clockers." 
One of the downfalls in Lee's films that have been detected, however, is his 
unnecessary emphasis on sex and nudity when it has very little to do with the 
story at hand (for proof, just take a look at his frustratingly uneven 1998 
drama, "He Got Game"), as if his only reason for adding these elements is 
simply because he can. 
Spike Lee's latest opus, "Summer of Sam," marks a major turning point in his 
career because, with this picture, he has swayed away from his usual 
African-American characters to focus on a group of white Italian Americans, 
which was a vital decision in his evolution as a filmmaker. And, ultimately, 
this film's often extreme sex and nudity (which had to be slightly trimmed 
when the MPAA first stamped the film with an NC-17) serves a definite purpose 
when dealing with the characters' conflicts, invoking a certain place and 
time, and leads to one of the more powerful moments in this 
long-but-not-too-long 144-minute epic. 
Set during the hottest summer on record in New York City, in 1977, while 
serial killer David Berkowitz, the .44-caliber killer, later titled the Son 
of Sam from a letter he sent to writer Jimmy Breslin, was going on a rampage, 
murdering primarily women with shoulder-length brown hair. The movie may be 
named after the Son of Sam, but he, as well as his grisly acts, pose as 
supporting characters. Instead, the film is about that fateful and memorable 
summer, when NYC was ablaze in hysteria due to the killings, and when many 
frightened women were getting blond wigs or getting their hair dyed. It was 
also the summer when, as already mentioned, there was an extreme heat wave, a 
city-wide blackout, and mass looting. Amidst all of this are the central 
characters, living in the Bronx. Vinny (John Leguizamo) is a hairdresser who, 
night after night, goes out with his sweet wife, Dionna (Mira Sorvino), to 
various night clubs to dance the night away. What Dionna does not know about 
Vinny is that he is a compulsive cheater, feeling the need to have sex with 
seemingly every woman he meets except his wife. When Son of Sam strikes 
within moments of him leaving an area where he was having a quickie with 
Dionna's cousin in a parked car, Vinny believes that he is next on the 
killer's hit list, and takes it as a sign to change his philandering ways and 
become a good, faithful husband again. This vow, indeed, proves more 
difficult than he anticipates. The other running story thread in the film 
deals with Vinny's best friend, Ritchie (Adrien Brody), who returns to his 
old neighborhood after living in Manhattan, but to the surprise of all of his 
old buddies, has taken up with the punk movement, complete with spiked hair 
and a leather dog collar around his neck. An amateur musician for his band 
called Late Term Abortion, Ritchie hooks up with the neighborhood slut, Ruby 
(Jennifer Esposito), and secretly begins to dance at a gay porn theater and 
make pornos for the extra money. When two police investigators approach a mob 
boss (Ben Gazzara) to help them search for the mysterious Son of Sam, he 
turns them down, but opts to rally up a group of his own friends to make a 
list of suspects, gradually narrowing them down to a select few.
"Summer of Sam," like some of the very best films (Robert Altman's 
incomparable 1975 masterpiece, "Nashville," comes quickly to mind), is a 
wildly ambitious motion picture overflowing with characters and stories, all 
of which are somewhat pawns in the grand scheme of things to vividly and 
accurately portray a certain place, this time that "place" being NYC in the 
summer of 1977. Aided by Spike Lee's fresh, assured direction, "Summer of 
Sam" is an electrifying, high-charged drama that is easily one of the most 
engrossing films I've seen thus far in 1999. Moving at a dizzying pace from 
one character and predicament to the next, the film only stops long enough to 
carefully observe the people's interactions with each other, and even then it 
has energy to spare.
Watching the film, you are not merely watching what is going on, but are 
practically put right in the middle of the horrifying chaos. The alternate 
desperation and fear that the characters are feeling, not only due to the Son 
of Sam but also from their own troublesome relationships, is always strongly 
palpable, and the film also succeeds as seldom period pieces do. Technically, 
while most movies set somewhere in the past usually seem like a bunch of 
actors playing dress-up and the settings looking manufactured, "Summer of 
Sam" feels as if Lee has literally gone back in time and really made the 
picture in 1977. To acquire this, a great deal of work has gone into the set 
decoration, production and costume design, research on the year of 1977, and 
Lee experiments with several different film stocks to give the picture an 
"in-the-moment" feeling. The cinematography, by Ellen Kuras, is strikingly 
distinct and moody, further helping along the setting of 1977. Another 
decisive technical element that is cause for praise is the astounding, edgy 
music score by Terence Blanchard that occasionally gives off an air of 
dreaminess and fantasy amidst the nightmare going on. Complimenting the score 
are the perfectly-chosen '70s songs, and it is one of the strongest song 
compilations on a period movie in recent memory.
Lest you have misunderstood, the Son of Sam killer, David Berkowitz (Michael 
Badalucco), is intermittently shown as a severely unstable man in extreme 
stages of schizophrenia. Pounding his heavy-set body down on the bed in his 
trashed apartment, writing wicked, ominous messages on the walls, Berkowitz 
is constantly being annoyed by the black labrodor retriever whom allegedly 
told him to kill in the first place, and in a shocking moment that might have 
been transformed into an unintentional laugh if it wasn't for the painful 
realism in which it was presented, the dog speaks to him briefly (voiced by 
John Turturro). When Berkowitz sets out to shoot and kill his victims, the 
murders are graphically, but non-exploitatively shown. There are no false 
scares and rising suspense, just a blink-and-you'll-miss it look of horror on 
the peoples' faces before the gun points straight for them and, BANG, they're 
life has been taken from them. Too often serial murder is superficially 
looked upon in mainstream films, so credit Spike Lee for taking these 
sequences and turning them into stark moments of pure, unadulterated terror.
John Leguizamo has had a misfortune so far in his acting career because he 
has been given usually comic, one-note roles (1997's horrific comedy, "The 
Pest," 1995's "To Wong Foo, Thanks for Everything, Julie Newmar"). In his 
first strictly dramatic role that I can remember, we are finally given a 
glimpse of Leguizamo as a talented, serious actor. His character of Vinny has 
his virtues--he cares for those people around them, is the symbol of normalcy 
around his off-beat, foul-mouthed friends who hang out at a "Dead End" street 
corner--but more often than not is a seriously flawed, unlikable man who 
blatantly has casual affairs despite the love and care that his wife gives 
him, and when he is caught, foolishly believes that she will forgive him for 
what he's put her through.
Academy Award Winner Mira Sorvino (1995's "Mighty Aphrodite, where she gave 
the best supporting performance of the decade) plays his suffering wife, 
Dionna, as a loyal woman who is close to her father and works as a waitress 
at his Italian restaurant. Suspecting Vinny is cheating on her, and unable to 
please him sexually, Dionna becomes distressed that something must be wrong 
with her. Starting off as the token "wife," Sorvino's Dionna eventually is 
uncovered to show us an unexpectedly strong woman who is firm in her beliefs 
and knows what is right and wrong. Leading to the most heartbreaking moment 
in the film, Dionna goes along with Vinny to Plato's Retreat, a sleaze club 
that turns into a free-for-all orgy. Feeling that if she participates in it 
with Vinny, she will gain his respect, Dionna is devastated afterwards when 
Vinny blames her for the whole experience, accusing her of not caring about 
him. Sorvino does not strike one false note, as we are able to deeply 
sympathize with what she is going through, even more so when she is revealed 
to be an intelligent, free-thinking woman later on.
Adrien Brody is exceptional as the misunderstood Ritchie, the character who 
is most suspiciously looked upon due to his quick-changing punk/musician/porn 
lifestyle, even though he clearly has the most virtuous personality. Seeking 
to be an individual, Ritchie is always changing his physical appearance and 
not really sure where his life is headed, but is loyal to Vinny, listening to 
his problems when even he knows what Vinny is doing could potentially destroy 
Dionna.
All other performances in "Summer of Sam" are also top-notch, particularly 
Ben Gazarra; Jennifer Esposito, who adds a fetching naturalism to her 
relatively underwritten role; and Patti LuPone, as Ritchie's mother who loves 
him dearly but finds herself throwing him out of the house because of her 
overpowering new husband (Mike Starr). Even Spike Lee appears as an 
inadequate news reporter who pops up every now and again to make a commentary 
on the goings-on in NYC, and adds a much-needed light dose of humor to the 
overpoweringly dark material.
Controversy has been surrounding "Summer of Sam" ever since Spike Lee began 
filming the picture in the exact neighborhoods where David Berkowitz once 
prowled the streets. This simple thought gives the film an added eerieness, 
but Berkowitz and the families of the victims have cried out about how 
exploitive this film would be. The good news for them is that they are wrong; 
the movie does not center or dwell on the gruesome slayings, but wisely 
exposes an open-ended tapestry of feuding stories, characters, and 
occurrences within a 2-month time period. Jimmy Breslin opens and closes 
"Summer of Sam," saying, "There are 8-million stories in the Naked City, and 
this is one of them." It is, indeed, and a truly spellbinding and powerful 
one at that.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Author
Ross Anthony
Here's one of those films that propose an ethical dilemma for me as a
reviewer. Nearly flawless as a production, but not the kind of movie I enjoy
watching. Nonetheless, I had some intention of giving "SOS" an "A-", but the
2 hour and 16 minute production ran about 16 minutes over. A surprisingly
significant mar to an otherwise awesome feat of filmmaking.
"SOS" is a grizzly picture about how an Italian neighborhood in the Bronx
reacts to the serial murders of the (unfortunately real life) infamous Son
of Sam. It's not really about the killer himself, kind of like the Titanic
wasn't really about a boat breaking in half (poor analogy, I know). Oh and
unlike the later, not a very good date flick.
The main character, Vinnie, is rather seemly (not unlike most of the
others). But Spike Lee, shows a great deal of directing and scripting
prowess with the ability to make us actually care about people, we would
probably keep our distance from in real life.
There's plenty of graphic violence as you'd expect, but also a surprising
amount of rough sex. These are seldom love scenes ... if you get my drift.
So why do I praise Spike? Picture-perfect diaglogue is evenly and
realistically dispersed among multiple actors. Also, these actors give
fantastic performances, especially Vinnie (John Leguizamo) -- you've got to
blame that kind of thing on the director. Lastly, save for the
aforementioned needless 16 minutes, the film progresses its tension level
smoothly from beginning to end. There are also the other masterfully crafted
elements like multi-dimensional characters that grow.
So why don't I recommend it? Bluntly ... it's no fun. It's a downer. It
started me resonating with an uncomfortable unsettling feeling that
continued 10 or 12 hours after the movie. Though, Spike would probably pat
himself on the back and shout out "mission accomplished" at my last
remark -- I don't find it amusing. In my view, the only positively redeeming
worth of the film lies in Vinnie's painfully learned lesson. But, it's a
lesson to which I'm hip. I didn't need 2+ hours of discomfort for it to have
made an impression; however, those rougher and tougher than myself may.
Starring John Leguizamo, Adrien Brody, Mira Sorvino,  plus. Directed by
Spike Lee. Screenplay by Victor Colicchio, Michael Imperioli and Spike Lee.
Produced by Jon Kilik at Touchstone. Rated R.
Grade ......................................... B
(C) 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted and shot
documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across North
America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews  visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Christopher Null
     As narrator Jimmy Breslin (as himself) puts it, there's 8 million
stories in the naked city, and this is one of them.  I just wish it
didn't have to be so long.
     Spike Lee's latest joint, like much of his recent work, is an epic
exercise in tedium.  While it's punctuated by moments of greatness  and
sometimes, even genius -- those moments come too few and too far between
to make SUMMER OF SAM a truly great film.  Sure, the tale of New York
City in 1977, when David Berkowitz, a.k.a. Son of Sam, was marauding
Brooklyn with a .44 revolver, is a great place to start.  But clocking
in at almost 2 1/2 hours, you're likely to wish Son of Sam had taken you
out at the halfway point.
     Again, Lee has plenty of raw material to work with: Leguizamo,
Sorvino, and Brody are all great actors (I'm blocking THE PEST from my
mind, forgive me), and the clever, neo-16mm look Lee has put on the film
really drops you into the late 1970s lock, stock, and mirrorball.  With
the disco/punk clash going on, a record heat wave, and Reggie Jackson
taking the Yankees to the World Series, the mis en scene is certainly
set.  Spike knows New York cold.
     But what about this script, which wanders aimlessly among Leguizamo
and Sorvino's marital troubles, Brody and his infatuation with the punk
scene and his need to do gay porn to earn cash, the mob society of
Brooklyn, and, of course, the Son of Sam and the dog which tells him to
kill Kill KILL!  These are actually four of those stories in the naked
city, and it's hard to care about all of them together.  A dozen
meandering side plots don't help matters either.
     However, Spike does excellent work putting you dead center in this
turmoil, and that I can respect.  But please, somebody bring me the head
of the editor on a silver platter.  (Of course, there were actually two
of them working on this picture... sigh.)
Director: Spike Lee
Producer: Spike Lee, John Kilik
Writer: Spike Lee, Victor Colicchio, Michael Imperioli
Starring: John Leguizamo, Adrien Brody, Mira Sorvino, Jennifer Esposito
http://movies.go.com/summerofsam/index.html
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Author
Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Rated on a 4-star scale; Screening venue - Odeon (Liverpool City Centre); 
Released in the UK by Buena Vista International on 14 January, 1999; 
certificate 18; 136 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Spike Lee; produced by Jon Kilik, Spike Lee.
Written by Victor Colicchio, Michael Imperioli, Spike Lee.
Photographed by Ellen Kuras; edited by Barry Alexander Brown.
It's exciting to own a camera; you can look through your viewfinder and 
comfortably mould life into perfect little rectangular artworks. Click on a 
button, and you've preserved a moment of reality. Cine cameras are even 
better; you've got the means to capture situations in more depth, and hey, 
you're making movies!
The filmmaker Spike Lee got his first cine camera in the Summer of 1977, and 
the imagination of the gifted young New Yorker must have been running wild. 
He must have done a lot of dreaming at that time, a lot of playing with his 
camera, and a lot of important thinking. I'll bet he remembers it well.
Lee's new film "Summer of Sam" is about that summer in his city, and takes a 
lot of time to illustrate the atmosphere. This was the strange, short time 
when disco and punk music were concurrently successful. When the Yankees had 
Reggie Jackson, and were winning the World Series. And when a serial killer 
dubbed 'Son of Sam' was terrorising the Bronx.
'Sam', eventually identified as a crazy mailman named David Berkowitz, 
stalked brunette women, or however they were with, and blew their heads off 
with a .44-caliber pistol. He sent creepy letters about his motives to the 
police, and to newspaper columnist Jimmy Breslin; his case made front-page 
news every day; and he was as hot a topic of conversation as the sun, music 
or baseball.
Among those discussing 'Sam' are Lee's main characters, a bunch of 
Italian-American guys who hang out on a street corner all day, letting 
boredom and poverty lead them into talking a lot of crap. Vinny (John 
Leguizamo) is a chain-smoking, disco-dancing hairdresser who can't help but 
cheat on his wife Dionna (Mira Sorvino). His best friend Ritchie (Adrien 
Brody) is losing popularity in the neighbourhood, because of his punk 
hairstyle and his romance with Ruby (Jennifer Esposito), the local slut. Joey 
T (Michael Rispoli), a drug dealer, and his goon Bobby (Brian Tarantino), 
slouch back and watch everything through arrogant eyes, convinced that 
they're better than all the scum out there, and that they'd kick the crap out 
of anyone who wants to try them. 
Lee plunges into this community and lingers around to see if any themes 
emerge. "Summer of Sam" is partly recollection, and partly a daydream about 
how elements of summer '77 could have driven people crazy. We get chilling 
glimpses into the apartment of Berkowitz himself, witness the tension and 
ignorance of our guys lead to the feeling that someone in their neighbourhood 
MUST be 'Son of Sam', and watch the lynch mob find its justifications for 
singling out an innocent culprit because he is different from the crowd.
"Summer of Sam" displays much fast cutting, grainy nostalgic footage and 
fancy tricks with lighting and loud music; like most of Lee's work, it's a 
visually and aurally engulfing film. As emotions get tenser, the temperature 
gets hotter, Sam takes more victims and people take too many ludes, Lee ups 
the film's pace, volume and reliance on close-ups, leading us into some 
frightening scenes of vigilante scapegoating.
The film is so involving because it seems to be a dance around Lee's memory 
and imagination. Yes, it falls far short of greatness because it's not really 
about all the themes that it brings up. But Lee has already made one strongly 
plotted examination of the way a community can be pushed over the edge in 
summertime, with his 1989 masterpiece "Do the Right Thing". Here he's trying 
something new. Good on him.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, The UK Critic's website, located 
at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Author
Walter Frith
Spike Lee disregards many aspects of the Hollywood establishment and makes
films his way and for good reason.  Because he is such a socially aware film
maker, his subject matter cannot fall victim to the studio system because it
simply wouldn't come off as credible.  I've liked and recommended every
Spike Lee film I've ever seen, including one from 1996 entitled 'Get on the
Bus' about a group of African-American men who drive across America to
attend the million man march in Washington D.C.  A small film of large
academic proportions, it is one of Lee's most under rated films and in many
ways is as good or better than his masterpiece, 'Do the Right Thing' (1989)
or his runner-up 'Malcolm X' (1992).  1995's 'Clockers' stands out as one of
Lee's most lethal film of the 90's and all of the films I've mentioned have
one thing in common: focus.  Unfortunately, Lee's latest film doesn't have
it.
'Summer of Sam' is a well acted, well directed but poorly written film about
the hellish summer of 1977.  I turned 12 in 1977 and have some vivid
memories about that year.  Entertainment losses were astonishing that year.
The world parted ways with Elvis Presley, Groucho Marx, Charlie Chaplin, and
Bing Crosby.  The biggest pop culture phenomenon of the 20th century, 'Star
Wars', was born on film and there was so much snow that fell where I live
that nearby Buffalo, New York was shipping much of it to Florida in train
boxcars and a local t.v. station in Buffalo created and sold a board game
based on that weather blister called 'Blizzard of '77'.  It was also the
year when a summertime horror story, that spanned over a year, was told in
New York City which serves only as a minor point in Lee's latest film when
it should have been the central focus of his story.
David Berkowitz, a man who claims Satan spoke to him through the mouth of a
big black dog and urged him to kill, went on a mass murder spree, attacking
at night and shooting young women with dark, shoulder length hair and even
attacking them most helplessly while sitting in their cars with a companion.
This would have been a fascinating story to tell because combining the
sympathy felt for Berkowitz's victims along with trying to find out what
made him do it and having debate among people who enjoyed such films as 'The
Silence of the Lambs', could have made 'Summer of Sam' a classic but I was
shocked to find out what the film does instead.  It takes a handful of
crude, unmannered people and tries to tell a story nearly two and a half
hours long based on their domestic problems, sexual escapades, ignorance and
shallow approach to life.  It's one of those movies that slips into enormous
tedium after the first half hour is up and you still have almost two full
hours to go!
Meet Vinny and Dionna (John Leguizamo and Oscar winner Mira Sorvino).
They're a young married couple who have a problem.  Vinny likes to play the
field.  He cheats on Dionna with her own cousin and chases anything in a
skirt including his boss, a much older woman at a beauty salon.  Vinny and
his pals hang out by dead end streets near the waterside, some dealing drugs
and there is always the "tough guy" factor where the guys are always getting
into scraps to see who is the toughest.  A stand out member of the cast is
Adrien Brody ('The Thin Red Line') as Ritchie, a punk rocker wannabe who is
suspected by his friends later in the film as being the serial killer.
Other major members of the cast are Jennifer Esposito, Anthony LaPaglia, Ben
Gazzara and Bebe Neuwirth.
Strangely, I kept thinking about Paul Thomas Anderson's 'Boogie Nights' from
1997, another film set in the disco era where a group of similarly
unattractive characters appeared in an attractive film about the lives of a
group of adult film personalities and the porno business was used as a
metaphor.  This film spanned a total of six years and gave the character's
lives focus as they progressed, matured and made choices affecting the rest
of their lives.  This was an appealing story with excellent execution.
'Summer of Sam', as well acted and directed as it is puts one in mind of a
car lost on a belt way and going around and around in circles..  The film
goes around and around and when the final act is played out, you feel the
same way about its main personalities as when the film began.  What little
progress there is is muffled by the fact that the murder plot is a throw
away and you're not exactly sure what the film's message is when it's all
said and done.  It all looks like no one cares.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Gary Jones
In the sweltering summer of 1977, New York was terrorised by the serial
killer known as Son of Sam. Although the killer and his crimes feature
in Summer of Sam, Spike Lee's film is more concerned with the squabbles
of a group of young Italian lowlifes and misfits who hang around on
street corners, swear a lot and beat each other up. 
It is the year of Saturday Night Fever and punk. Philandering
hairdresser Vinnie (John Leguizamo) takes his wife Dionna (Mira Sorvino)
to the disco, while Ritchie (Adrien Brody) has embraced the punk
movement and started wearing spiky hair and affecting an atrocious
English accent. They live in a Bronx neighbourhood where, it is thought,
the killer might live, and suspicion soon falls on the increasingly
estranged Ritchie, whose punk look and lifestyle is making him an
outsider.
Certain sequences, such as the killings themselves, are stylishly
realised, but the film succeeds or fails by the character studies of
Ritchie and Vinnie. Ritchie is an interesting character we can believe
in and sympathise with, but the characterisation of Vinnie is utterly
tiresome. The character is a louse, sure, but he could have been made an
interesting louse, instead of which he bores while he repels. And this
is a long film. The characters must also have something to do that
interests us and develops the story or relates somehow to the film's
themes. I suppose the film was about loyalty and suspicion, but it took
an awfully long time to say, well... not a lot really.
It is possible that the film was not properly projected the day I saw it
(the BBFC certificate before the film did not have the customary
brilliance and clarity I've come to expect from the usually excellent
Warner cinemas) but the film seemed poorly photographed, and this dull
look added to the feeling of gloom and tackiness the film inspired. 
With Summer of Sam's New York setting and its cast of Italian wiseguys,
Spike Lee must have known he was inviting comparison with Martin
Scorsese. Despite some good performances and some interesting moments,
its script ensured that Summer of Sam could never be anything more than
a brash but ultimately dull Scorsese pastiche.
-- 
Gary Jones 
Homepage: www.bohr.demon.co.uk
PGP public key available from servers (DH/DSS key ID: 0x11EAE903)

Author
Scott Renshaw
SUMMER OF SAM
(Touchstone)
Starring:  John Leguizamo, Adrien Brody, Mira Sorvino, Jennifer Esposito,
Michael Rispoli, Michael Badalucco.
Screenplay:  Victor Colicchio, Michael Imperioli and Spike Lee.
Producers:  Jon Kilik and Spike Lee.
Director:  Spike Lee.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, sexual situations, adult themes, drug use,
violence)
Running Time:  136 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I see Spike Lee working.  I have a pretty good idea what he was up to
with SUMMER OF SAM.  This would his a saga of a more dangerous New York
circa 1977, when the Big Apple was more famous for muggings than for
musicals.  It would be a tale of how paranoia can amplify the xenophobia
that already exists in so many people.  It would be a story of one very
specific demon -- "Son of Sam" serial killer David Berkowitz (Michael
Badalucco) -- which also explored the demons many of us keep hidden just
beneath the surface.  It would be an examination of the uncomfortable link
between the criminal and the tabloid media that exploited him.  It would
be both ambitious and intimate, both a period piece and a piece of who we
still are.  It would be an Important Film.
     I see Spike Lee working, and I saw SUMMER OF SAM working...up to a
point.  His account (co-written with Victor Colicchio and Micheal
Imperioli) of New York's hot, hellish summer of '77 focuses on two Bronx
neighborhood buddies and their relationships.  Vinny (John Leguizamo) is a
hairdresser with trouble remaining faithful in his marriage to Dionna
(Mira Sorvino); Ritchie (Adrien Brody) is a would-be punk rocker who has
moved to the Village and taken up with Ruby (Jennifer Esposito), a
neighborhood girl with a "reputation."  Though they now live in different
worlds -- Vinny's a little bit Studio 54, Ritchie's a little bit CBGB's --
they remain friends.  That friendship becomes dangerous as the summer
heats up, fear of the .44-caliber killer intensifies, and the guys in the
neighborhood begin making their own personal lists of suspects, including
Ritchie.
     For a while, the stories of Lee's two main characters are promising
enough that SUMMER OF SAM keeps you watching.  Vinny begins to
disintegrate after a close encounter with the killer leaves him torn
between a desire to reform and his inability to control his libido.
Ritchie, meanwhile, uses dancing and turning tricks at a gay club to
support his drug habit and budding career, his external outsider image
hiding an even more outsider lifestyle.  Leguizamo is particularly strong
in his role (will someone _please_ put this guy's talent to good use?),
but both characters work in juxtaposition to the Son of Sam -- they're
anti-social people who happen to functionally anti-socials.  Though the
period production design comes and goes, there's still a strong sense of
this particular time and place in New York.  We see 1977 as a more intense
period in the life of the city, when the thin connecting thread of rooting
for the Yankees was always ready to snap into violence.
     There are lots of big issues moving through SUMMER OF SAM, and Lee is
ready to make sure we always know it.  As talented a visual stylist as he
can be, Spike Lee is also a film-maker who often doesn't know when to stop
himself.  He gets infatuated with distorted perspectives, or finds some
way to cram in his favored "character moving on the camera track" shot, or
edits not one but two montages to the accompaniment of songs by The Who.
Lee even opens with an extended crane shot that serves as a big flashing
red light that the director wants TOUCH OF EVIL/BOOGIE NIGHTS respect for
his project.  It's often invigorating, but it's also an attempt to cover
for a story that lets some sub-plots drag on forever (Vinny and Dionna's
ho-hum marital woes) while letting others disappear just when they seem
interesting (Anthony LaPaglia as a detective with mob ties in his
background).  Lee may be talented, but his pure id approach to directing
leads to some baffling decisions.
     No decision in SUMMER OF SAM is more baffling -- or more harmful to
the film -- than Lee's portrayal of Berkowitz himself.  It was a risky
enough maneuver introducing Berkowitz as a character at all rather than
leaving him as a bogeyman haunting the periphery of the film; it was even
riskier to show him freaking out in his apartment.  But Lee goes past the
point of no return when he actually shows a big black dog telling
Berkowitz to kill in John Turturro's voice, lips moving like he was a
refugee from BABE.  That scene turns a killer's demented rampage into
absurdist comedy, making you wonder what the hell Lee was thinking.
Clearly he had ideas spilling out of himself as he prepared for SUMMER OF
SAM, a million different stories he wanted to tell in this one story about
the naked city.  At times it gels into a gripping film.  At other times,
you can see Lee working...and you can see him working far too hard.

Author
Susan Granger
http://www.speakers-podium.com/susangranger.
  The perennial question facing film-makers has always been:
Should movies try to influence their audience - using morality
stories, fables, fantasies, etc. - or should movies simply, often
boldly, reflect the society of their time? Spike Lee chooses the
latter. There's no doubt that the anger and violence, stupidity and
intolerance that he depicts are real. But do you really want to spend
a sluggish two hours with these unpleasant, unsavory characters?  Set
in the sweltering summer of '77, when the Son of Sam psychopath, David
Berkowitz, went on his bloody killing spree in the Bronx, the story
revolves around two couples who are long-time friends. Mira Sorvino
and John Leguizamo are into disco, while Jennifer Esposito and Adrien
Brody are punk rockers. Each has his/her own sexually explicit
problems (mostly drug-connected) but, collectively, they're spooked as
they're swept into the gruesome details of Berkowitz's indiscriminate
slaughter. And Ben Gazzara scores as the local crime kingpin who is
determined to protect his neighborhood. Problem is: there's no bond
between the moronic characters and the audience. Is it the
one-dimensional roles in the episodic screenplay by Victor Colicchio,
Michael Imperioli, and Spike Lee? Perhaps. But, as a director, Lee
seems out of his element with these idiosyncratic Italian-Bronx
characters and keeps us utterly detached. And, as an actor, Lee
delivers a wretched performance as a TV newscaster overemphasizing
each line. While this film is visually stylish and vigorous with
pertinent historical imagery, it is, as Jimmy Breslin says, just one
of eight million stories of the naked city - and quite a racist one at
that. On the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, "Summer of Sam" is a
bleak, brutal, repellent 3. Don't say you weren't warned.

Author
Michael Dequina
_Summer_of_Sam_ (R) **** (out of ****)
"There are many stories to be told in the naked city; this is just one."
 This line, which is uttered during the conclusion of _Summer_of_Sam_,
could not better sum up Spike Lee's terrific film.  The film's title does
refer to the serial killer Son of Sam, but, as that line says, that is
just one of the many stories followed in the film.  More than anything
else, _Summer_of_Sam_ is a portrait of its chosen time period, the hot
New York summer of 1977.  And what a vivid portrait it is.
Son of Sam (played by Michael Badalucco, also notoriously known as "the
44-caliber killer" for his weapon of choice, plays a prominent role in
the film, but not in the way one would expect.  While a few of his
murders are depicted in horrifyingly bloody detail and his reign of
terror provides the film with its time frame, _Summer_of_Sam_ is
concerned less with him than his psychological effect on people in New
York City, namely the Bronx.  Films dealing with serial killers often
tackle this angle, but usually the people in question are either victims'
families or the cops investigating the crimes.  The characters whose
lives are examined in _Summer_of_Sam_ have no direct ties to the killer
nor his activities, but they are all profoundly affected by them.
The effects, of course, widely vary with the person.  Dionna (Mira
Sorvino) more or less tries to live life as she always has even though
she fits the common victim's demographic of "woman with shoulder-length
brown hair."  Her husband Vinny (John Leguizamo), on the other hand,
fears that the killer has seen him during one of his many extramarital
trysts and is thus a target.  While not necessarily a reaction to Son of
Sam, Vinny's old friend Ritchie (Adrien Brody) has undergone a radical
personality change, embracing the anarchic spirit of punk rock, which he
spreads to old friend and eventual lover Ruby (Jennifer Esposito).
These are just the starting points for these characters; as the film and
Son of Sam's killing spree progresses, their relationships and
personalities undergo drastic shifts.  While Vinny's less-than-blissful
marriage to Dionna is given perhaps the most screen time, the focal
relationship is between Vinny and Ritchie, whose deviant behavior leads
people to erroneously suspect him of wrongdoing.  The actors give superb
work, and in the case of Brody and especially Leguizamo (of whom, I must
admit, I have never been a fan), career-best work, investing these often
unlikable characters with enough humanity to command our sympathies.
By extension, praise goes to Lee and his writing collaborators Victor
Colicchio and Michael Imperioli, who do a deft job of weaving the
fact-based stream of events surrounding Son of Sam with the fictional
storylines they have created.  All the characters were going to do what
they do regardless, but, as depicted by Lee and the writers, being in
such extreme circumstances heightens the tension and thus gives them a
push toward more extreme actions.  Even more impressive is how the story
is convincingly manipulated to spin around the entire picture of the
culture at the time, from the liberating abandon of punk to disco's
spirit of limitless pleasure.
 _Summer_of_Sam_ ultimately belongs to Lee, who makes nary a false move
here.  He has always been a great creator of images, and the ones he
presents here make a powerful impact.  One memorable montage sequence
scored to "Teenage Wasteland" is a marvel of both freedom (in its driving
energy) and control (in economically advancing the story and distilling
the society's mood of the moment).
The visceral impact comes second to the film's emotional power, which
hits hard by film's end.  There are no easy answers nor tidy resolutions,
which is just as well.  _Summer_of_Sam_ may strike some as unsatisfying
in that sense, but that is what is what makes it such a convincing slice
of ordinary lives during an extraordinary time.
Michael Dequina
twotrey@juno.com | michael_jordan@geocities.com |
jordan_host@sportsmail.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site:  http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline:  http://www.HollywoodHotline.com
on ICQ: #25289934  |  on AOL Instant Messenger: MrBrown23


Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Touchstone Pictures/ 40 Acres & a Mule
 Director:  Spike Lee
 Writer:  Victor Colicchio, Michael Imperioli, Spike Lee
 Cast: John Leguizamo, Adrien Brody, Mira Sorvino, Jennifer
Esposito
   You'd need an awful lot of fingers and toes to count the
number of times that movie villains are thwarted by
explaining their motives.  In the James Bond series, the
typical miscreant might say, "Welcome, Mr. Bond. 
In a few moments you will be propelled to your fiery end.  Try
to avoid the heat and a pleasant journey to you." Minutes
later, 007 frees himself and gets the drop on the scoundrel. 
In "The Mummy," the title character might have plunged his
knife immediately into the heart of Evelyn the librarian but
takes the time to announce his motives, giving O'Connell the
opportunity to send him back to his sarcophagus.  Even in
the delightful children's movie "Shiloh 2," Judd, a lonely,
unloved drunk, announces, "You haven't heard the last of
me, Ray Preston," giving the congenial dad all the warning he
needs to keep his distance from the rascal.  Far scarier is the
psychopath who kills without warning, without giving the
victim the slightest chance to talk him out of his deed, to get
help, to get the drop.  No wonder, then, that David Berkowitz,
the so-called son-of-Sam killer, terrorized entire
neighborhoods in New York City's outer boroughs in 1977.
He simply walked up to his victims and shot them.
Ultimately Berkowitz, whose deeds conferred on a man the
title of serial killer for the first time, gave himself away just
like the knaves in the movies--by taunting the good guys and
ultimately by a careless mistake that led to his capture. 
Before his apprehension, though, his random, unproclaimed
acts of mayhem forced people to barricade themselves into
their homes at night, even driving some women to dye their
hair blonde to appease the killer, whose insistent target was
brunettes.
   The son of Sam's executions have a somewhat different
effect on a group of 20-something Italian Americans living in
an ethnic ghetto in the Bronx.  This band of alienated young
people do not display the usual signs of anxiety.  Not for
them the locking down, the defensive barricading so
favored by potential victims.  Displaying some of the same
macho traits of hatred as the killer himself, the pack of largely
racist, homophobic toughs use the apprehension of the
community as an excuse to trounce and intimidate those
they loath.  They direct their aggression
particularly against a despairing punk rocker, who has just
been thrown out of his apartment by his parents (in the film's
most comic moment), and who makes extra money turning
tricks and acting in porno flicks.  Building up a specious case
against him like a modern band of holy inquisitors, they vent
their spleen against the innocent but flawed young man in
much the way that Berkowitz releases his frustration through
multiple murders.
   Director and co-writer Spike Lee, a frequent critic of
Hollywood's attitude toward black filmmakers--who is known
for his credo that only blacks should direct movies about
African-Americans--veers off in an unusual direction with the
making of "Summer of Sam."  His first film without a single
major black character, "Sam" proves that you don't have to
be a white director to make a compelling movie about white
people.  Though an occasional racist epithet receives voice in
this film, the black experience is strictly in the background,
giving Lee the opportunity to hone in primarily on Italian-
Americans--a group toward which he had shown particular
interest in his "Jungle Fever"--about the sexual relationship
between an African-American man and an Italian-American
woman.  Reminiscent of Lee's 1989 look at Brooklyn's
leading black community in "Do the Right Thing"--wherein the
forty-two-year old director took a close look at individuals
amid a racial incident involving Italian-American pizza
vendors--"Sam" is more a collage of events than a unified
drama.  Its disjointed nature is likely, more than any other
factor, to generate some negative reviews and
less-than-enthusiastic audience response.  But Lee is so
entertaining in his mixture of comedy, domestic strife and
police drama that for the most part his discontinuous
production works.  Moving along briskly enough and more
than occasionally highlighting the torments of dysfunctional
people, "Summer of Sam" succeeds in furnishing a period's
pain to the screen, a time in New York that tempers were on
edge from the hundred-plus degree heat, a blackout that
brought devastation to local neighborhoods and the
apprehension wrought by a menacing psychopathic killer.
   The story begins on a promising note.  In place of the
usual long array of credits, Lee puts tough-talking journalist
and author Jimmy Breslin in the forefront, as the steetwise
reporter ticks off an introduction to a time more dangerous
than the present in the city that he knows, loves, and hates
so well. After briefly introducing a ragtag bunch of
ne'er-do-wells, Breslin puts the spotlight on Vinny (John
Leguizamo) and his slinky wife Dionna (Mira Sorvino). Disco
and punk are au courant in 1977, and womanizing is in
fashion as ever.  The perpetually horny Vinny is so
compulsive in his sexuality that at one point he excuses
himself from his wife on the dance floor to grab what he can
from a neighborhood bimbo in his car.  During this year,
Ritchie (Adrien Brody), a friend of Vinny, gives in to
the punk style--adding spikes to his hair style, effecting a
Cockney accent, and taking up with Ruby (Jennifer Esposito)
while making some extra money dancing in a low-life gay bar.
   "Summer of Sam" does best when Lee focuses on the daily
rounds of his pitiful group of toughs, subtly indicating the
loneliness and poverty of imagination that inform their lives. 
When they hang out, they don't discuss the latest trends on
Broadway, the state of the movies, or the quality of their
careers.  Their batteries are charged only when they
exchange wholly unproved conspiracy theories and
particularly when they gang up, intimidate, and beat those
who do not look, act, or talk like them.  Far from feeling
genuine fear of the serial killer, they are invigorated by
accounts of his horrific deeds. Berkowitz's killings give the
gang all the justification they need to carry out a campaign of
villification against those who do not fit in with their life-styles. 
By contrast, the director is least effective in showing
Berkowitz himself.  As played by Michael Badalucco--who
resembles the real-life killer only in his ample weight--
Berkowitz is seen almost literally climbing the walls of his
seedy apartment, bouncing on his bed with rage while he is
under the influence of a big black dog who apparently urges
him to kill.  (Appropriately enough, Berkowitz believes that the
name of this satanic dog is Harvey.) The film does not paint a
convincing portrait of the police, who are guided by Luigi (Ben
Gazarra),  going all-out to capture the elusive slayer.  Lee
seems almost to be telling us to ignore the details of son of
Sam's killings in order to focus almost wholly on the gang. 
Lee's portrayal of the relationship between Vinny and Dionna
and on the tortured psyche of Ritchie easily form the story's
most compelling segments.  John Leguizamo, known by
cognoscenti mainly for his comic roles in the stage
monologues "Freak" and "Spic-O-Rama" is equally effective
in his dramatic capacity here, keeping the sparks flying in his
link with his wife, played by Mira Sorvino--who never looked
more provocative.  Sorvino has her audience hissing each
time she forgives her husband's trespasses, ultimately
cheering when she gives up on the hopeless creep.  Adrien
Brody's portrayal of Ritchie again demonstrates this young
actor's depths, heretofore on best display in his starring role
in "Ten Benny." 
   Whether this artistic accomplishment will translate well at
the box office remains to be seen.  The film is thoroughly
urban, bound to grip the enthusiasm of big-city dwellers
everywhere, while at the same time likely to convince
conflicted suburbanites that perhaps they did the right thing
by moving out.  "Summer of Sam" is about as subtle as
Jimmy Breslin.  With loud music and upfront posturing, it
makes for an entertaining, powerful experience at the movies.

Author
Jesse Kopelman
Spike Lee directs a movie set in the summer of 1977, the year in which the
Son of Sam conducted his killing spree. If you are not a fan of Spike Lee,
this movie will not change your mind. Its inherent faults are shared with
many of his other movies, especially its cumbersome length and unsatisfying
ending. Despite its title, _Summer of Sam_ is really the story of a guy
named Vinnie who looses control of his life at the same time David Berkowitz
looses control of his. Berkowitz is portrayed brilliantly by Michael
Badalucco, while Vinnie is John Leguizamo in fine form. I think this
dichotomy of title and story is what hurts the movie the most. While
Vinnie's story is very interesting, it is nowhere near as interesting as
that of the Son of Sam. There are many scenes involving Berkowitz that,
while powerful, distract from the main story. Speaking of which, Vinnie's
problems are twofold. First, he can't stop cheating on his wife, played by
Mira Sorvino. Second, his best friend and he have grown apart and some in
the neighborhood think the friend is the killer. Not a bad plot, but Lee
can't seem to narrow his focus. He crowds too many side stories into the
movie, diluting its powerful main story. As an aside, Mira Sorvino once
again portrays a good woman put upon by those she loves -- Sound familiar?
Sorvino is a very good actress, but I am sick of her playing the same
character in every movie. She should try playing a villain or, at the very
least, someone a bit bitchier. In the end, this movie was compelling, but
not satisfying. Lee has shown a talent for interesting characters and
situations, but he has rarely  been able to deliver a good movie. In his
case, the parts always seem better than their sum.
Ratings go like this: Abominable, Bad, Fair, Good, Very Good, Great, and
Perfect. As you might guess, most movies are Fair to Good. Very few movies
are either Abominable or Perfect.
--
Jesse Kopelman - thebruce@paonline.com
"It's not worth leaving, until you've worn out your welcome."

Author
Jeremy Vay
         The craft was, for the most part, there. It's just that the
materials used in the crafting could have, perhaps, been better. This
film seemed like a lesser Do the Right Thing, exploring many of the same
themes, but with much less of an impact.
         Most of the acting is pretty good- at least better than
average. John Leguizamo, Mira Sorvino, and Adrien Brody (among others)
give good performances, but don't seem to have very good characters to
work with. The viewer is never actually allowed to grow close enough to
any of the characters to really care what happens to them. The story
seems to be about how the enviroment of the time and place lead people
to change and even turn on each other, but from the very beginning of
the film, al the characters seem to be too wretched to really hold dear.
         Because of this, much of the tension simply seems forced, so
when it is meant to explode, it really only seems to obscure itself
somehow. Perhaps this is because Lee wastes his own stylistic talents
here. He uses many clever stylistic techniquies and approaches, but
because the characters and events have never become too involving, the
bravura of the moment is lost and we're left with Lee's crafty
camerawork or editing simply looking like a silly up-cropping of
pretension.
         There was one scene that was actually somewhat satisfying: a
Hollywood montage sequence of the neighborhood usuals all doing their
things to get through the restless summer, most of them seeming to fall
apart at least a littlein the process. This is all put to the tune of
The Who's "Won't Get Fooled Again," and may be the best or most
interesting seqeunces of the film, yet it loses its impact because it
sticks out from the rest of the film which is mostly steps blow this. It
would simply have worked better if the film had found a way to flow into
and out of it, but it didn't and that is a shame because this film had
probably a greater potential than was put to use.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Author
Christian Pyle
New York City, 1977.  Coming home from a disco, Vinny (John Leguizamo) sneaks
into a crime scene and sees the bloody corpses of a couple shot by the ".44
Killer."  The killer would soon by sending letters signed "Son of Sam" to
newspaper columnist Jimmy Breslin (who appears at the beginning and end of
"Summer of Sam" as himself).  However, Sam (Michael Badalucco) and his murders
serve mostly as background in Spike Lee's new movie.  
"Summer of Sam" is really about Vinny and his friend Ritchie (Adrien Brody),
who's just returned to the neighborhood with spiked hair and an affected
British accent.  Vinny is cheating on his wife, Dionna (Mira Sorvino), because
he refuses to ask her for the oral and anal sex he desires.  Dionna feels Vinny
slipping away from her but cannot figure out how to please him.  Because of his
punk look, Ritchie finds himself an outcast in the neighborhood.  While trying
to get a band together, Ritchie makes extra money by dancing at a gay club and
turning tricks in the john.  He finds a soulmate in Ruby (Jennifer Esposito), a
neighborhood woman whose sexual history makes her an outcast as well.
As the murders mount and the summer heat wave goes on, tensions rise.  The guys
in the neighborhood start their own investigation to find the Son of Sam.  They
make a list of everyone who is odd, and Ritchie rises to the head of the list. 
Just as his marriage is collapsing, Vinny is called upon to choose sides
between Ritchie and the other guys in the neighborhood.
This is familiar territory for Lee.  His best-known film, "Do the Right Thing,"
also chronicles the disintegration of a neighborhood and the search for a
scapegoat, and it did so with more complexity and sophistication.  However, the
center of "Summer" lies not in its portrait of a neighborhood but in its
exploration of Vinny.  The dynamic of miscommunication and misunderstanding
between Vinny and Dionna is sensitively played by Leguizamo and Sorvino.  Vinny
is caught up in the madonna/whore dichotomy of his Catholic upbringing and
cannot see his wife as a suitable object for animal lust or Ruby as a suitable
wife for Ritchie.  Knowing that Vinny goes to other women to fulfill his baser
needs, Dionna is forced to the embarrassing necessity of asking Ruby (who used
to sleep with Vinny) for advice.  The tension between Vinny and Dionna reaches
a breaking point when they take part in an orgy.
Lee's style has grown increasingly pretentious over the years.  The greatest
flaw of "Summer" is the way that Lee draws attention away from the characters
with overplayed technical tricks such as tinting scenes and jump cuts,
techniques which seem intended to shout, "Hey look at me, I'm an auteur."  Like
"Get on the Bus," in which Lee overused many of the same techniques, "Summer"
has a strong, character-driven script and a talented cast.  The director's
style should enhance these strengths, not distract attention from them.
Look for lots of familiar faces in small roles.  Bebe Neuwirth (Lilith on
"Cheers" and "Frasier") is Vinny's mistress of the moment. Patti LuPone (of
"Life Goes On") and Mike Starr (a thug in numerous movies) play Ritchie's
parents. Anthony LaPaglia is a detective tracking the killer, and Ben Gazzara
is the local mob boss.  Michael Imperioli (from HBO's "The Sopranos") manages
the gay strip joint; Imperioli also co-wrote the screenplay and served as an
executive producer. John Turturro provides the voice of the dog that orders Sam
to kill.  Spike Lee plays a novice TV reporter; he has a wonderfully sly,
satiric scene when his character broadcasts from a black neighborhood with "the
darker perspective."
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.wpd.net/madreview/

Author
David Sunga
Written by: Spike Lee, Victor Colicchio and Michael Imperioli
Starring: John Leguizamo, Adrien Brody, Mira Sorvino, and Jennifer Esposito
Synopsis: 
It's 1977 in a small Italian American neighborhood in New York. Disco music
is popular, and the Sexual Revolution is on, but the people of New York are
not happy. In fact, they're terrified. As in Spike Lee's DO THE RIGHT THING
a heat wave has the city in its grip, and peoples' tempers are flaring. The
cool of night offers no respite: the neighborhood is being terrorized by a
nocturnal psychotic killer who calls himself the Son of Sam. No one knows
who the Son of Sam is, and no one is safe.
All around New York people are different. Aside from cultural groupings and
ethnic neighborhoods there are differences between individuals. In the
Italian American section of town a philandering husband named Vinny (John
Leguizamo) tries to hide his trysts and sexual behavior from his long
suffering newlywed wife Dionna (Mira Sorvino). Vinny's friend Ritchie
(Adrien Brody) hates disco, works at a gay strip club and doesn't want any
of the neighborhood folks to know. Ritchie's girl Ruby (Jennifer Esposito)
is trying to escape a reputation as a slut. Everyone's different, but
nobody in the film wants to be framed as "alien" to the community. 
Unfortunately, the killings help create a climate of suspicion pits
neighbor against neighbor. 
Opinion:
Director Spike Lee's SUMMER OF SAM is not about a psycho killer. Nor is it
about cops trying to apprehend him. It's about differences and how, given
the right conditions, even close neighbors can fan the hostile flames of
irrational suspicion.
One thing I found interesting in SUMMER OF SAM was the use of sex. In other
movies sex is glamorized. For example, James Bond gets a sexual reward for
winning. Or boring made-for-video "suspense" movies are spiked with
gratuitous lingerie scenes just to keep the audience awake. And every movie
or soap opera character in these flicks seems to have expert sexual
prowess. Not so with SUMMER OF SAM. In a very gutsy move director Spike Lee
shows sex without fantasy. Sex is there, but it isn't gratuitous or
titillating. In fact, some of the main characters are downright lousy in
bed. Sex is in the film because (sexual) deviance is part of the film's
major theme of "difference" breeding hostility. In my opinion this kind of
movie sex is cutting edge for 1999, as rare and thought-provoking in
American cinema as showing a spanking.
Copyright Š 1999 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
Holly Baublitz
    Personally, I am a horror-movie fan. However, being a true movie
buff, I see just about every new release that comes out. When I heard
about "Summer of Sam" I thought it would be a good "shock factor" movie.
Then I had second thoughts.. I have never cared much for Spike Lee's
movies, especially how they all seem to be laced with racial undertones,
sometimes unnecessarily, at times. But, I went with my father, who went
simply for the "shock factor" thinking it was going to be a "bloody
movie about the killings".
I will admit, it was quite bloody. The murder scenes are shown and
they aren't in any way made easy or glorified. However, the movie is not
based on the murderer, the murders or the victims. The victims names
aren't even mentioned at all that I can remember in the movie, and,
although the murderer is portrayed, he isn't the basis of the movie. The
movie is more about society around the time of the murders, and the
murders and killings are simply a backdrop for a story about a group of
friends growing up in New York. John Leguizamo plays one of the main
"tough guys", portraying a young husband to Mira Sorvino that you can't
help but hate and feel sorry for at the same time. Sorvino is absolutely
star-struck in this movie, looking wonderful as ever but also giving a
performance that makes you feel for her as well as her situation. The
one car scene, in which she is accusing her husband, Leguizamo, of
cheating on her with her cousin is absolutely amazing, one which drew
applause from the audience of the theater in which I was in. I know I
was cheering for her. You GO, Girl!
The murderer is in no way glorified. He is portrayed as a sick,
psychotic man who, even in this movie, is not clear as to why he is
killing except for the fact that he is seriously messed up in the head.
The movie deals with the prejudices of the area and time, with the
"tough guys" of the neighborhood thinking they can go out and
single-handedly find the .44 caliber killer with their own brains and
"process of elimination". It deals with society and it has a story
simply backlogged by the horrible events of the murders. At the end, of
course, the murderer is caught, but that isn't the end of the movie.
Without giving away the end, let's just say that you leave the movie
with a sense of relief that the sick psycho was caught, but another
feeling of dread that there is such harsh prejudice in this world that
some people cannot see past appearances... even when it comes to their
own friends.
Spike Lee overlooked the racial proponents of his past films and,
although a slight racial slur in the middle of the movie during the
"black out riot news report", there is more to his movie than race for
once. It is NOT a shock-film, but a combination of a great script,
cinematography and acting which, put all together in a nut-shell, ended
up to be a great story placed in a not-so-great time in history. If war
films can be made and films can be made about families living in the
time of World War I or II, this can be equivelent to it.. it's simply
about a group of people living through a very frightening and scary
point in our history. Granted, it wasn't a very happy time, but neither
was the Invasion of Normandy and Speilberg didn't get any flack about
his "Saving Private Ryan". Lee.. Good job. Keep it up, and I applaud you
for doing this movie with taste and respect. It came out to be, in my
mind, a real eye opener and a work of art. !!!!

Author
Jon Popick
You would think that a movie about David Berkowitz, the Son of Sam
killer, would be fascinating.  Well, it might be.  I don't know, because
Summer of Sam isn't that movie.  Replacing what could have been an
interesting story is a hodgepodge of dull characters played by even
duller actors with occasionally interesting photography and an
irritating score.  They say there are eight million stories in the naked
city, and they sure picked the dumbest one to tell.
The film opens and closes with a Jimmy Breslin narrative.  He's the guy
that Berkowitz wrote letters to during his killing spree in the dog days
of 1977.  That summer also featured scorching temperatures, a blackout
(and looting attendant thereto), the Yankees' run for the pennant, the
emergence of Studio 54 and the birth of the punk scene.  Director Spike
Lee (He Got Game), who co-wrote the script with first-timers Victor
Colicchio and Michael Imperioli (Christopher from The Sopranos), crams
so many plotlines and characters into the film that you could literally
nod off, wake up, and think that a completely different film was playing
(I didn't fall asleep, but really wish that I had).
Loosely held together by the killings are the stories of:
   * Sex-crazed Vinny (John Leguizamo, Spawn) and straight-laced Dionna
     (Mira Sorvino, At First Sight), a young couple plagued by
     hairdresser Vinny's infidelity and penchant for looking and acting
     like a Tony Manero (Saturday Night Fever) wannabe.  When he isn't
     trolling for tail, Vinny hangs out with
   * Joe T. (Michael Rispoli) and his Goomba gang of posturing failures
     that think that the .44 killer could be
   * Ritchie (Adrien Brody, The Thin Red Line), a burgeoning fan of the
     British punk scene (complete with bad English accent) who is forced
     to live in the garage after walking in on his mom and step-father
     in the midst of a raucous shag-fest.  Ritchie secretly works in a
     gay club, shoots porn and eventually starts the band Late Term
     Abortion with his girlfriend
   * Ruby (Jennifer Esposito, I Still Know What You Did Last Summer), a
     vivacious neighborhood girl who shuns her Italian roots to be with
     the outcast Ritchie.  She ignores the fact that her boyfriend is on
     the short list of potential killers composed by
   * Luigi (Ben Gazzara, Happiness), the king of the community, who
     organizes a blackout party and arms the citizens with baseball bats
     to keep the looters out of his neighborhood.  Luigi was apparently
     somewhat of a father figure to
   * Detective Lou Petrocelli (Anthony LaPaglia, Lansky) who, together
     with Detective Curt Atwater (Roger Guenveur Smith), haplessly
     stagger in and out of the film in an attempt to catch the killer
   * David Berkowitz (Michael Badalucco, The Practice), a crazy guy who
     looks like he lives in a Nine Inch Nails video and is driven off
     the deep end by
   * His neighbor's dog (voiced by John Turturro) who will give hophead
     viewers something to piss their shorts over.
The film has occasional moments of visual brilliance, and viewers can
almost smell the stench of the rancid New York streets, thanks to
cinematographer Ellen Kuras' (The Mod Squad) rich photography.  Sam's
ending transforms the capture of Berkowitz into the fervor of a huge
rock concert.  But that's been done before (and better, in Natural Born
Killers).  And why is Berkowitz only shown sporadically through the
film?  Why don't we see what makes him tick?  For some reason, Lee
doesn't even show his face when he offs his victims.  Speaking of
victims, viewers will wish that each one of these horrible people in the
film would be a casualty.  And some will even wish that they were murder
victims as well.  And don't get me started on the extended orgy scene or
the two music videos that are roughly inserted into the film.  Lee is a
talented filmmaker, but only when he has a good script (read: not one of
his own).
There are precious few funny scenes (other than the talking dog), like
when Joe T. and gang go to a Late Term Abortion show at seminal punk
club CBGB, dressed like goodfellas, to question Ritchie about the
murders.  They walk out of the club saying that they could take ten
showers and still not rid themselves of the bar's fetor.  You could say
the same thing about Summer of Sam as you walk out of the theater.
(2:22 - R for strong graphic violence and sexuality, pervasive strong
language and drug use)

Author
Akiva Gottlieb
rated R
Touchstone Pictures
141 minutes
starring John Leguizamo, Adrien Brody, Mira Sorvino, Jennifer Esposito, Ben
Gazzara, Bebe Neuwirth, Anthony LaPaglia, Mike Starr, John Savage
written by Victor Colicchio, Michael Imperioli and Spike Lee
directed by Spike Lee
I'm not a big Spike Lee fan. He has continuously made racist remarks
on the Holocaust, and the characters in his films are often racist
caricatures. I don't know Spike Lee personally, so I don't want to
call him a racist, but what, exactly, does he stand for? Not for
racial tolerance, certainly not for African-Americans, and not really
for himself either. Lee, while being quite inconsistent, has made some
fine films("Do The Right Thing", "Malcolm X"), but none of the
messages have been too similar. "Do The Right Thing" ends in a race
riot, but is followed by anti-violence quotes from Martin Luther King
and Malcolm X. Spike Lee may not be a hypocrite, and his films may not
be morally ambiguous, but he needs to get his messages clear, because
I just don't recognize them.
The latest Spike Lee Joint, entitled "Summer Of Sam", seems like a
departure from his usual social commentary on race relations. There is
not a single black main role, as Lee has chosen to infiltrate the cast
with poorly conceived Italian-American characters. But in later
scenes, Lee also shows a cross-section of African-Americans; all
uneducated.
"Summer Of Sam" is referring to the summer of '77, when serial killer
David Berkowitz(a.k.a. Son Of Sam) commited close to 10 murders of
young New York City couples; targeting those with shoulder-length
brown hair. As journalist Jimmy Breslin tells us, it's just one of the
millions of stories that happen in NYC every day.
John Leguizamo plays Vinny, a married man who hasn't been too faithful
to his innocent wife, Dionna(Mira Sorvino). One night, while cheating
on his wife, he catches a peek at the Son Of Sam after he has just
commited a murder, and he becomes paranoid that the .44 killer will
strike him next.  His best friend, Ritchie(Adrien Brody), is a NYC
punk complete with mohawk and British accent, and is the town's first
Son Of Sam suspect.
When a mob boss(Ben Gazzara) decides that the cops aren't doing a good
job on the case, he decides to give out a larger reward for whoever
can get him the Son Of Sam.  Then, a heat wave knocks out all power,
and the hunt for Son Of Sam is in overdrive.
Although Spike Lee has provided us with a very entertaining 141
minutes, he doesn't get to touch upon all of his ambitious subjects in
the film. At times, I was unsure of where "Summer Of Sam" was headed,
but Lee packs enough energy to make the film a dynamic powerhouse.
John Leguizamo and Adrien Brody are each terrific, while the other
actors take on supporting roles.
Spike Lee takes on Scorsese territory in this film, and he also
borrows a bit from Paul Thomas Anderson's "Boogie Nights". While
"Summer Of Sam" has all the components of a cool movie(the 70's, NYC,
punk rock, the Mob, serial killer), the formula doesn't always add
up. Also, Lee doesn't stop using excessive sex, violence and drug use;
a tactic that ruined "He Got Game", but fits in to the era here.
Despite the many flaws of "Summer Of Sam", what I liked most was the
improbable premise; that New York could be turned upside down because
of one lunatic. While I still don't like Spike Lee, I must say that I
recommend this film to any guy who likes "GoodFellas" or "Boogie
Nights". Overly ambitious, overwrought and in overdrive.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Author
Eugene Novikov
"The 44 Caliber Killer has struck again."
Starring John Leguizamo, Mira Sorvino, Adrian Brody, Jennifer Esposito,
Michael Rispoli, Bebe Neuwirth. Rated R.
Summer of Sam will be remembered as a waste of Spike Lee's abilities.
Lee is a great filmmaker, often exhibiting kinetic visual flair on par
with Brian DePalma and Martin Scorsese and a storytelling ability
comparable to Steven Spielberg. But here, he gets himself into a bind.
His latest effort is a case of a director pretending he has something to
say when in reality there is little of substance to absorb from his
work.
The summer of 1977 was an unusual summer in New York City. It was the
hottest summer on record. To boot, New York's first serial killer was on
the loose: calling himself the Son of Sam, David Berkowitz killed 9
people in the New York area and frightened the whole city population. So
it was understandable that when NYC was hit with a citywide blackout,
people went berserk, causing billions of dollars in damage to the city.
The movie's focus is on a group of twenty-somethings during that fateful
summer: Vinny (John Leguizamo), a club-hopping, adultrous hairdresser,
his benevolent wife Dionna (Mira Sorvino, looking young), Ritchie
(Adrian Brody), a punk who becomes an outcast as well as a Son of Sam
suspect, a gang of small time mobsters and a few more minor characters.
We follow them through their roller coaster lives, thrown out of whack
even more by the recent killings. Vinny and Dionna have marital problems
because Vinny cheats and Dionna tries to please him, make him stay
faithful to her. Ritchie gets shunned by his group of friends because he
has started to become more and more "eccentric," and has degenerated to
the point of dancing in gay night clubs and making porno films with his
girlfriend.
Tensions build and conflicts arise as the anniversary night of Son of
Sam's first murder looms; the night he promises he will strike again. A
local gang with too much time on its hands makes a list detailing all of
the people that its members think might be suspects. At the top of the
list is Ritchie. Vinny, an unwilling part of the said group, is called
upon to set a trap for his friend.
As we watch these proceedings, some of which are painfully graphic, the
dreaded "So what?" question springs to mind. From the way this movie is
made, I'd have guessed that Spike Lee was trying to tell us something,
but as I searched deeper it became clear that there is very little there
to find. Lee touches on so much -- the media, the 70's punk scene, the
details of the actual killings, as well as the characters' very personal
dilemmas -- but he doesn't bring all of his topics together to form a
coherent theme or make a discernible statement.
All is not lost if a movie turns out to be hollow; it can be a saving
grace for the film to be enjoyable. Too bad Summer of Sam doesn't get
any help here. Frankly, it's a bore, a redundant and repetitive two hour
and twenty minute film that doesn't entertain beyond its first half
hour. There is no suspense because the film refuses to be fully about
the murders and little involving drama because the film is too muddled
and its focus too vague.
Leguizamo's turn as Vinnie is annoying and whiny. The script makes it
clear that we're supposed to believe that his character is flawed, but
still a good guy. You'd never guess from his performance. Adrian Brody
and especially Mira Sorvino fare better. Sorvino gives a riveting,
touching performance in a banal movie (I'm tempted to think that I liked
her because nearly everything else around her was inane); her character
is affecting and her emotions true-to-heart. Brody, too paints an
effective portrait of a young guy desperate for attention who gets a
little more than he bargained for.
Summer of Sam has some superficial elements of a good film: it looks
great, it has a few notable performances and I suppose it's pretty well
directed, in a purely technical way. But it's also empty, pretentious
and boring. Like last year's The Thin Red Line, it's a movie by a
director who doesn't know what he wants to say but goes ahead and says
it anyway.
Š1999 Eugene Novikov
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Author
Bob Bloom

 Summer of Sam (1999)  2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring John Leguizamo, 
Miro Sorvino and Adrien Brody. Directed by Spike Lee.
 In Summer of Sam, filmmaker Spike Lee has tried to create a mosaic of 
what is was like in New York City during the summer of 1977, a time when 
a deranged individual, later known as the Son of Sam, held the city in a 
grip of terror. 
 Sam, also called the .44-caliber killer because of his choice of weapon, 
went on a yearlong killing spree that left several people  mostly women 
 dead. 
 Lee's film is not so much a story about Sam himself, but about the 
paranoia that gripped the city and its effect on its residents.
 Lee concentrates his story on one Italian-American alcove in the Bronx, 
where suspicion and fear hold the neighborhood in a vise of fear.
 While the overall canvas is fascinating, Lee did not allow every part of 
his painting to dry before exhibiting it for the public.
 His movie's main focus is on Vinny (John Leguizamo), a hair dresser 
continually cheating on his faithful wife, Dionna (Oscar-winner Mira 
Sorvino). 
 The movie also examines the strain put on the friendship between Vinny 
and Ritchie (Adrien Brody), a guy from the neighborhood now involved in 
the British punk scene.
 With his spiked hair, dog-chain collar and outlandish dress, Ritchie 
immediately falls under the suspicious eyes of the other dimwits in the 
neighborhood who consider him a prime suspect for all the killings.
 And that is the concept that is Lee's double-edged sword. The 
blue-collar boys in this 'hood are beer-swilling, foul-mouthed idiots. 
None, except for Vinny, hold a steady job.
 If two of Summer of Sam's writers had not been Italian, Lee could be 
accused of racism. As it is, he presents a rather grim and depressing 
picture of a poor neighborhood where there's really nothing to do but 
hang out and fuel one's darker side.
 As usual, Lee hits his point with a sledgehammer, having the men 
congregate under a large sign reading "Dead End." Subtlety is not Lee's 
forte.
 The biggest flaw with the movie is it has no hero. Vinny is a lowlife 
whiner, drug-user and adulterer. 
 And his friends are no better. Ritchie, at least, has some nobility, as 
he goes about trying to make something of himself by joining a punk rock 
band and trying to stay true to his convictions.
 Except for Ritchie, Lee gives his audience no one we can really care 
about. 
 Sorvino has one good scene in which she finally explodes at Vinny, 
spewing her pent-up frustrations about their relationship, his 
philandering and their going-nowhere lives together.
 Lurking behind all of this is the character of David Berkowitz, who Lee 
brings to center stage for a few moments throughout the 
two-hour-and-20-minute drama.
 But even here, Lee goes overboard. A sequence in which a delusional 
Berkowitz hears Sam (the dog who allegedly ordered him to kill) speak is 
done in such a manner that it creates laughter instead of horror or pity 
from the audience.
 Summer of Sam is a flawed, but ambitious, exercise. It's loud, long and 
interesting, yet it also feels cold and distant. Lee tries to bring the 
city alive, making it the film's main character. He only partially 
succeeds, and that is the film's biggest disappointment.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, 
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com. or at 
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director: Spike Lee
Cast: John Leguizamo, Adrien Brody, Mira Sorvino, Jennifer Esposito,
Michael Rispoli, Saverio Guerra, Bebe Neuwirth, Anthony LaPaglia, Ben
Gazzara
Screenplay: Victor Colicchio, Michael Imperioli, Spike Lee
Producers: Jon Kilik, Spike Lee
Runtime: 142 min.
US Distribution: Touchstone
Rated R: strong graphic violence and sexuality, pervasive strong
language, drug use
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Before going into Spike Lee's Summer of Sam, I knew that it wasn't
actually about the serial killer who terrorized New York citizens before
his capture in 1977.  It actually centers around a group of people who
lived in the same neighborhood as the Son of Sam, and focuses on the way
they reacted to a feeling of confinement based on fear.  John Leguizamo
and Mira Sorvino star as Vinny and Dionna, a married couple sexually
unsatisfied with one another.  The film emphasizes their relationship,
in addition to Vinny's relationship with his friends in the
neighborhood.
Summer of Sam is an ambitious, visually striking picture.  It reminded
me very much of Lee's previous film, He Got Game, and also has many of
the same problems.  The picture is very unfocused, and often doesn't
seem to have much momentum (it's also needlessly long, and meanders
towards the end).  The focus is distractingly skewed between the
troubles with the married couple and the neighborhood paranoia.  And
there are numerous scenes featuring the Son of Sam himself, and Lee
dramatizes most (if not all) of the killings; I found all of these
sequences unnecessary and gratuitous -- the film isn't a psychological
thriller about the killer himself, and his presence doesn't feel right.
Problematic as it is, Summer of Sam still harnesses an amazing sense of
tension; the film actually features one of the most suspenseful scenes
I've seen in recent years (those who have seen the film will remember
the scene in which we expect both Vinny and Dionna to be killed by the
Son of Sam).  The performances are all very good, with particularly
strong work from Leguizamo and Adrien Brody (as Vinny's punk-rocking
friend).  I liked parts of the movie very much, and I found it to be an
authentic painting of the period, but I left the theater not knowing
entirely what to make of it.

Author
Chad Polenz
Summer Of Sam
Chad'z rating: **1/2 (out of 4 = okay/average)
1999, R, 122 minutes [2 hours, 22 minutes]
[drama/thriller]
Starring: John Leguizamo (Vinny), Adrien Brody (Ritchie), Mira Sorvino 
(Dionna), Jennifer Esposito (Ruby); written by Victor Coliccho, Michael 
Imperioli, Spike Lee; produced by Jon Kilik, Spike Lee; directed by Spike Lee.
Seen July 20, 1999 at 6:10 p.m. at Crossgates Cinema 18 (Guilderland, NY), 
theater #4, by myself for free using my Hoyts season pass. [Theater rating: 
***: excellent sound and seats, picture was slightly blurry]
On the drive home from `Summer Of Sam,' I could sense a major dilemma 
going on inside my head (I wonder if the fact it was a movie about a 
psychotic serial killer had anything to do with it?). I felt as though I had 
just seen a really powerful film since I was slightly nervous, shaken, even 
nauseous, but I couldn't tell if that was good or bad.
I think trying to honestly express my thoughts and fairly review the 
film will be a real challenge for me, at least in the usual way I write 
reviews. But then I remembered Roger Ebert's review of `The Hudsucker Proxy' 
in which the entire review was written as a dialogue between an angel and a 
devil pointing out the good and bad things with the result being a compromise 
between four stars and none. I feel the same way about this film, although 
I'll give it **1/2 which is, what I consider, my `neutral' rating or `your 
call' rating (which it is if you consider my rating scales goes: 0, *, **, 
**1/2, ***, ***1/2, and ****. Ebert's verdict was ** for `Hudsucker,' which 
means the devil ultimately won).
And so, to pay homage to one of my inspirations, I'll compose this 
review in a similar matter except with `Optimistic Guy' and `Pessimistic 
Guy,' (I don't think an angel would like this film). But first a quick 
synopsis of the plot and whatnot*.
The film takes place in New York City during the summer of 1977 when 
the Yankees ruled baseball, young people were divided into camps of disco 
versus punk, a massive heat wave kept everyone sweating in buckets and a 
deranged maniac calling himself `Son Of Sam' scared the entire country to 
death by repeatedly blowing away couples whose only crime was sitting on a 
stoop or making out in a car. He appeared out of the shadows, blasted his 
victims with a .44 caliber handgun and just as quickly as he appeared he was 
gone, with almost no solid leads, clues or witnesses.
The actual story does not involve a police investigation into the 
killer (although a pair of detectives on the case do act as minor supporting 
characters), but instead the effect the paranoia and fear has on the 
residents of the city, especially in the Bronx where the main characters live 
and work.
OPTIMISTIC GUY: Spike Lee is really onto something here by making a movie 
about a serial killer and not making him or the authorities' attempt to hunt 
him down the focus of the film. Instead, he just tells, basically, one long 
character study to show what a challenge it must have been to just live on a 
day-to-day basis. You really get a sense of the intense heat and the overall 
uncomfortable feeling. 
PESSIMISTIC GUY: I agree that this is an interesting new take on the worn-out 
serial killer genre, but Lee goes a bit too far by making it too much of a 
character study. He obviously wants to show what it must be like living in a 
city of panic, so why concentrate the story on just a handful of main 
characters? And why make it so melodramatic in the process? All the 
characters here are difficult to figure out: Vinny (Leguizamo), the 
hairstylist gigolo who never seems happy and we can't just chalk that up to 
the paranoia aspect; Dionna (Sorvino), his wife who is too stupid to realize 
what a sleazebag he is and leave him, especially considering that she can't 
figure out how to please him sexually; Richie (Brody), an old friend of 
Vinny's who's gone punk and sometimes talks in a British accent, but you get 
the feeling he's gone punk mostly to spite the world, not because he enjoys 
it. The semi-major subplot involving his closet homosexuality and his 
relationship with his girlfriend Ruby (Esposito) is really strange. This 
should have been explored more, especially considering the mix of the 
characters - a nihilist punk rocker and his generic slutty girlfriend (what's 
her motivation for staying with him?)
OPTIMISTIC GUY: You have to remember that Chad has only seen one other Spike 
Lee film, so the feeling that this might be new territory for Lee may not be 
correct. It's true that the characters' backgrounds and emotions could have 
been sketched out more, but this clearly isn't your run-of-the-mill drama, 
it's about a significant time in history about fear of becoming a victim. 
Considering many of the event going on in the world today - school shootings, 
gang violence, suburban kids doing drugs and babies having babies, etc., it's 
a timeless allegory.
PESSIMISTIC GUY: If it's really just a human drama, why even bother showing 
what David Berkowitz must have been like at home and inside his mind while 
this was all going on? Those shots of the children's wooden blocks with 
numbers and letters don't come off as very thrilling or scary, it just seems 
like a rip-off of `Se7en' or `Taxi Driver.' In fact, there's many instances 
throughout the film where the mood will suddenly change from the dramatic to 
the surreal without a smooth transition. This is reflective of how the 
screenplay often loses track of the characters and lets them wander too far 
without justification. Towards the end they all seem to have fallen off the 
wagon, but what wagon were they on to begin with?
OPTIMISTIC GUY: If you look at many of the films released in recent years 
about the 1970s they all have that same theme of decadence; casual, 
guilt-free sex; the joy of abusing your body, etc. And they all end up with 
the same message - that there's always a price to pay. When all the 
characters do the bad things they do, they all get theirs in the end.
(Final arguments)
OPTIMISTIC GUY: It's a creative drama about some very interesting characters 
and is simultaneously a good suspense thriller. The perfomances all are 
Oscar-worthy, and I'd imagine it must have been a huge challenge for both the 
actors and the filmmakers to endure making a film of such intesnity on a 
daily basis. You'll definitely be moved, shocked and you won't be the same 
afterwards.
PESSIMISTIC GUY: Yes, but that's not what I or most people want out of their 
summer entertainment. Although there's justice in the end, the way the film 
tries to seduce you with much of its anarchic and lurid subject matter is 
just gratuitous. There's way too much sexuality thrown in, seemingly for 
shock value (for example, that orgy scene which was almost sickening), ditto 
for the wickedly-profane dialogue (been there, done that). A good edit and a 
rewrite of the script would have done wonders for the film. The cliché `Less 
is more' is so true.
In the end, we... err... `I' say `Summer Of Sam' is a flawed 
masterpiece - interpret that any way you want.
*another homage, but I think only Ted Prigge will get this reference.
---------------------------------
Please visit Chad'z 
Movie Page
 - over 230 new and old movies reviewed in-depth, not just blind ratings 
and blather capsules.
Associate member of The O.F.C.S. (Online 
Film Critics Society)

Author
Michael Redman
Summer is a magical time. Young children run themselves until exhausted every
day. School kids, free of the tyranny of schedules, discover what they really
want to do. Even responsible adults traditionally take time off the workaday
grind to kick back and have a real life.
In the best of all possible worlds, the season is a time of possibilities.
Hours reading a novel on the front porch swing seem well-spent. Days in the
woods away from the constant electronic hum of civilization are invigorating.
The opposite sexes in their abbreviated warm weather wardrobe are so...err, fetching.
And like almost everything, summer has its darker side. The sweltering heat
and humidity can be oppressive. On a bad day, everything feels dirty and
grimy. Tempers flare.
In 1977, New York city is having a summer of all bad days. The temperatures
are unbearable. A power blackout results in massive looting. The Son of Sam is
murdering innocent lovers and has the city frozen in fear.
For a group of Italian-Americans in the Bronx, it's a time of change. Ritchie
(Adrien Brody) returns to the neighborhood after a few months living uptown
with spiked hair and a bad British accent. Hairdresser Vinny (John Leguizamo)
struggles with his desire to be faithful to his wife Dionna (Mira Sorvino),
but repeatedly fails.
As the summer wears on and the murders mount up, paranoia takes center stage.
Women are wearing blonde wigs to throw the killer off track and everyone looks
at their neighbors with suspicion.
The guys start drawing up a list of possible suspects. The priest down the
street is a little odd. Even Reggie Jackson almost makes the list. And
Ritchie? Well, Ritchie's been acting strange since he came back and no normal
person would have hair like that.
Director Spike Lee has a talent for presenting his characters as sympathetic
even with their flaws. Vinny wants to be a good husband, but has bought into
the "whore or Madonna" view of women. He hungers for adventurous sex but can't
bring himself to approach his wife with the idea so he turns to extramarital
affairs. Dionna believes it is her fault he isn't interested in her. (In the
nineties she would have recognized that as co-dependency, the fashionable
psychological defect of the decade.)
Ritchie just wants to play rock and roll, but to buy a guitar he works as a
male prostitute. He looks like a dangerous tough guy, but underneath there's a
gentle side. When he falls in with local "bad girl" Ruby (Jennifer Esposito),
there's genuine affection. During their first time together, she starts to
perform a particularly intimate act on him and he tells her it's not necessary
- they can just spend time together.
At the core of the film is the relationship between Ritchie and Vinny. Friends
since childhood, their camaraderie takes some twists and turns during the long
hot summer, culminating in a Biblical allegory.
Lee has some touches of genius. During the beating of an innocent victim, the
participants discover their error and slowly drift away mostly wordless. It
seems so _real_. His use of varied film stock works to pull us right in. He
has the seventies down, from discos to Plato's Retreat.
But he falters occasionally. Other than the main four, the characters aren't
very well developed and sometimes slip into cliche. When Lee appears in a bit
part as a television reporter, we are pulled out of the film as we recognize him.
The director's biggest risk is showing David Berkowitz (Son of Sam). Although
those scenes are effective in themselves, the film would have worked better if
we had seen only the results of his actions, not him.
There's something undeniably authentic about this film and, considering the
events of the past weeks, hits a little too close to home for comfort.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and would like to
commend the family of Won-Joon Yoon and the Korean Methodist Church for a
subtle yet courageous demonstration of the unity of all people in their
full-page thank-you announcement in the "Herald Times". The message closed
with a quote from Starhawk, a practicing Wiccan.)
[This appeared in the 7/15/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Author
Jonathan Hauer
Directed by: Spike Lee
Written by: Victor Colicchio and Michael Imperioli
Cast: John Leguizamo, Adrien Brody, Mira Sorvino, Jennifer Esposito, Michael
Badalucco
It is the summer of 1977, and not only is it hotter than the summer of
"Do the Right Thing" but the Son of Sam has struck again, and the
neighborhood brown-outs are driving New Yorkers to new heights of deviance.
Brooklyn is being looted, the mob is turning vigilante, and anyone who is
outside of the neighborhood's realm of understanding is prey.
Spike Lee's new film once again uses a sensational catalyst to tell a
story about the human condition. In "Do The Right Thing" it was a heat wave,
in "He Got Game" it was the lure of celebrity and money, and in "Summer of
Sam" it is the infamous serial killer (for whom the term was coined), David
Berkowitz.   The "Son of Sam" becomes our excuse to abuse, accuse and harm
one another.
John Leguizamo turns in his best performance to date as the slimy, yet
sympathetic, Vinny, a man torn between holding together his neighborhood and
maintaining the integrity of his friendship with Richie (played by Adrian
Brody).  Brody is the real stand-out in a cast large enough to include both
Ben Gazzara and Bebe Neuwirth.  Richie has returned from travels, and has
been greatly influenced by the English punk movement.  When Richie returns
to his old friends, he is sporting spiked hair, multiple piercings and a
fake cockney accent.  This impresses some, but quickly intimidates others
that find safety and comfort in the routine of the neighborhood.
Mira Sorvino plays Vinny's wife, Dionna, and is effective and believable
as a woman who just wants to make her husband happy until pushed over the
edge.  Michael Badalucco plays the Son of Sam himself.  While his crimes, as
we are shown at various intervals throughout the movie, are incredibly
shocking and scary, the murderer seems more pathetic and comic than scary.
One of his
key scenes involving the dog that commanded him to murder comes off as more
comic than harrowing.
This film is one of double standards.  Vinny is willing to cheat on his
wife, but if another man should insult her, he becomes vicious.  The local
gang harrasses and mistreats the token neighborhood homosexual, but the
minute someone from outside the neighborhood should do the same they use it
as an excuse to attack.  When the horror and hysteria of Son of Sam's crimes
reach their dizzying and climactic heights, the neighborhood uses it as an
excuse to commit their own horrible acts towards those that intimidate them
through individuality.
Spike Lee and writers Victor Colicchio and Michael Imperioli (of HBO's
"Sopranos" watch for his cameo as Midnight) show us that the big apple is
divided into neighborhoods that are every bit as gossipy as the small towns
of America, and just as isolationist.  At once it seems that the film is
telling the story of the New York City in the summer of '77, but it becomes
clear that this is truly a lesson in humanity in all of its horror and
glory.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Summer of Sam (1999)
John Leguizamo, Adrien Brody, Mira Sorvino, Jennifer Esposito, Anthony 
LaPaglia, Bebe Neuwirth, Patti LuPone, Ben Gazarra, Joe Lisi, Michael 
Badalucco, Michael Rispoli, John Savage, Roger Guenveur Smith, Saverio 
Guerra, Brian Tarantino, Arthur Nascarella, Jimmy Breslin, Al Palagonia, 
Ken Garito, Mike Starr, Spike Lee. Screenplay by Victor Colicchio, 
Michael Imperioli and Lee. Directed by Spike Lee. 142 minutes.
Rated 3.5 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to 
pbbp24a@prodigy.com
In Spike Lee's crackling "Summer of Sam," the lead character is not an 
individual, but an entire neighborhood; specifically, a Bronx 
neighborhood in 1977, when the killing spree of a demented postal worker 
took an already blistering New York summer and cranked the temperature 
even a few degrees higher. Like "Do The Right Thing," Lee's best film, 
this is a kinetic tapestry about temptation, anger, bigotry and paranoia, 
one which gives the viewer a sense that everything is about to come apart 
and we are witnessing the last few moments before the meltdown. "Summer 
of Sam" has moments that are tough to watch, but for the most part, they 
are so well-presented that it is impossible to avert your eyes.    
Writer Jimmy Breslin sets the scene, and in short order, we witness a 
figure lumbering through the night; David Berkowitz, the Son of Sam 
killer, committing his sixth and seventh murders. While the entire city 
is galvanized by the crimes, the film follows one group of people near 
the heart of the madness. John Leguizamo is Vinny, a hairdresser who 
routinely cheats on his wife Dionna (Mira Sorvino), seeking out women who 
will do the things he dares not request of his spouse, then wallowing in 
guilt over his actions. Dionna, who works in her father's Italian 
restaurant, pretends not to notice her husband's philandering and tries 
to come up with something, anything, that will inspire him in their own 
bed.
Meanwhile, Vinny's best friend Ritchie (Adrien Brody) has shaken up the 
locals by adopting the punk look, sporting spiked hair, freaky clothing, 
a bad English accent and loads of attitude. To them, he has mutated into 
some bizarre and possibly dangerous alien life form. Even after he hooks 
up with Ruby (Jennifer Esposito), the official neighborhood slut, he 
continues working as a dancer/hustler in a seedy gay nightspot, while 
pursuing dreams of musical stardom in the burgeoning punk scene at CBGB's.
As the Son of Sam continues his reign of terror, now sending letters to 
Jimmy Breslin boasting of his actions, the citywide tension escalates. 
Street traffic decreases as people stay in the safety of their homes, 
while many of the women who do venture out color their hair blond or don 
wigs, because the female victims thus far have been brunettes. Two police 
officers approach local crime lord Luigi (Ben Gazzara) for help and soon, 
the neighborhood good old boys are organizing to patrol the streets and 
find the killer themselves. Suspicion rises along with the heat as 
collective mood moves closer and closer to some dread precipice.
Spike Lee is a master at image manipulation and does fine work here, 
deftly incorporating period music, very effective lighting (particularly 
strobe effects and various white lights) and fragments of grainy footage 
at just the right moments to create a riveting feel of immediacy. The 
only time he falters is in his depiction of the twisted mind of the 
killer. Shots of David Berkowitz flailing about his apartment, shrieking 
at a barking dog, look stagy and unconvincing. One particularly daring 
scene shows a dog actually speaking to Berkowitz, courtesy of computer 
graphics. Instead of seeming horrific, the image just looks gimmicky, 
drawing laughs instead of shivers.
Aside from the Berkowitz interludes, Lee's stylings achieve the desired 
effects, drawing us into the various individual vignettes while remaining 
focused on the bigger picture of the dissolution of a neighborhood. Vinny 
and Dionna desperately try to keep their marriage together, visiting 
Studio 54 and Plato's Retreat along the way; Ritchie persists in his 
strange personal odyssey; and the tension keeps growing as the first 
anniversary of the initial Son of Sam attack draws near, with the killer 
promising to celebrate the occasion.  
I've heard complaints that too many of the secondary characters in 
"Summer of Sam" are rough sketches at best and stereotypes at worst, but 
I didn't find them troubling, because this is a film about a group 
mentality rather than sharply defined personal profiles. That said, the 
lead characters all do fine work, particularly Leguizamo and Sorvino, 
both of whom provide appropriate depth and richness to their characters.  
While not approaching the glimmering perfection of "Do The Right Thing," 
"Summer of Sam" is another impressive step in Spike Lee's evolution as a 
filmmaker. His innovative techniques are less obtrusive than in previous 
works, efficiently serving this disturbing tale of the variances of 
societal tides without coming off like showboating. Except for the 
talking dog, of course.

Author
Jerry Saravia
Has he lost his mind? Has Spike Lee lost all sense of reason or purpose in
making a film? After the greatness of a disturbing, provocative documentary
like "Four Little Girls," Spike made a noisy, pretentious, overheated
basketball drama called "He Got Game." Its chief merit was Denzel Washington's
controlled performance. Now we have the noisy, melodramatic, overheated,
overbaked and needless retelling of the "Summer of Sam" - a hot, noisy New York
summer of 1978 when the Son of Sam killer was loose in the streets and made
media headlines. I assume the latter is Spike Lee's intention as well with each
film he makes. 
Make no mistake, "Summer of Sam" is not an introspective character study of
Samuel Berkowitz. Instead, the writers Michael Imperioli, Victor Collichio and
Spike focus on the sweltering summer itself - the paranoia and the decadence
that surrounded the frenzy of Sam's murderous rampages on the city of New York.
For a while, "Summer of Sam" works and keeps us on guard. We see the local
Italian gangs rallying against Sam by keeping track of everyone who comes and
goes in the neighborhood, the brunettes wearing blonde wigs to escape Sam's
wrath upon blondes, the all-night disco clubs, the promiscuous activities at
Plato's Retreat, an orgy club, the swagger and sweat of the macho, sexist
Italian men, the constant hurling insults, the cops vying for a local Mafia
boss (Ben Gazzara) to help in the murder investigation, and...wait a second. I
know where I have seen this type of anthropological view of New York's boroughs
before. I've seen it in Martin Scorsese's mob dramas, and I could not wait to
see one of those films again as opposed to Spike's stereotypical portrayal. 
The main story in "Summer of Sam" deals with the rocky relationship between the
endlessly posturing Vinny (John Leguizamo), a hairdresser, and his darling,
faithful wife, Dionna (Mira Sorvino), a waitress at her father's restaurant.
Vinny is a philanderer and unfaithful - he will have sex with anything that
crosses his path. After witnessing one of Sam's murder victims, he decides to
mend his sinful ways, though it is short-lived since we are treated to a
needlessly long sequence involving the infamous Plato's Retreat. 
The most interesting characters in this overlong effort are the punk rocker,
Ritchie (Adrien Brody), who sports a thick British accent, and his sexy
girlfriend, Ruby (Jennifer Esposito) - their scenes are electrifying and
stimulate the senses. I wish Spike focused on this couple since their scenes
have no clichés and rivet our attention. In marked contrast, the Vinny and
Dionna marriage becomes repetitious and tiresome after a while, and the actors
bring no dimension or spin to their characters. There is only so much of
Leguizamo's swagger I can stand.
There are a couple of sequences that do work mainly because they involve the
racial parameters of a community - Lee's forte ever since "Do the Right Thing."
There's a sequence involving the Mafia boss talking to the police officers
about trapping Sam, and the boss rightly pointing out that there are murders in
Harlem every day and nobody reports them. I also like the subplot where the
gang is convinced that Ritchie is Sam because of his deviant activities, such
as his nightly gay dancing and punk rock sensibilities (he also lives in a
garage). The idea of needing a scapegoat in a community that is lost with
desperation to find the killer is timely and profound - this is all pure
vintage Lee.
Beyond that, we get heated scenes of marital discord, hurling obscenities (Joe
Pesci was never this obscene), and countless scenes of burly Sam roaring with
pain in his bedroom and close-ups of his shoes pounding the pavement as he
approaches his victims seated in parked cars. Since the film is not truly about
Sam Berkowitz, do we need countless shots of gunfire? Do we need to see a
ludicrous scene of a dog speaking to Sam? Has Spike Lee become too
literal-minded? Has he forgotten how to draw insight from his characters? 
In terms of visceral filmmaking, Spike Lee is still a demon of a filmmaker, but
he is no visionary. The film is exceedingly well-shot and edited (many
high-contrast shots; delirious montages) but it all serves little purpose,
meaning or significance. What we learn about the fervent summer of 1978 is that
there were power outages, the weather was hot and humid, and people cursed and
had sexual escapades. Spike has forgotten how to do the right thing within all
the madness - to forge drama and insight from it all.. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     Spike Lee co-produces and co-directs this story of a group of
people living in Bedford Stuyvesant section of New York.  The film is
not really about the Son of Sam murders themselves but about the
atmosphere of dread created by the killings.  Central to the story is
Vinny the hairdresser (played by John Leguizamo), his wife Dionna (Mira
Sorvino), and Vinny's boyhood friend Ritchie (Adrien Brody).  Vinny is
flashy and flamboyant, a local favorite in the club disco scene.  Vinny
is living the life of easy sex, illegal drugs, loud music, and too much
drinking.  His wife dotes on him but admits to herself that she somehow
failing to satisfy him and is disappointing him.  Ritchie has affected
a British punk hairstyle and a phony British accent.  Most people in
the neighborhood cannot understand what Ritchie is doing but Vinny
defends his friend.
     Meanwhile the paranoia over the killings is getting to the
neighborhood.  There is a general assumption that the Son of Sam is
someone from the neighborhood and someone they all know.  With the
tacit approval of the police vigilante groups form to try to track down
whoever is doing the killing.  In a witch hunt atmosphere anyone who
seems out of the ordinary, even ball-player Reggie Jackson, can be
suspect.  All the while we see little bits of the Son of Sam himself
living in torment from his personal demons then striking like some
Angel of Death.  He is just tangential to the story but hangs over all
that goes on.
     Spike Lee has structured the film a lot like his DO THE RIGHT
THING.  There is a violent incident toward the end of the film and
virtually every scene is buildup to this moment of violence.  In DO THE
RIGHT THING; however, it was a mystery where the story was going.  In
SUMMER OF SAM it is very obvious what is going to happen and the viewer
is left to wonder only how long it will take and how will it happen.
The answer the second question is "longer than you think."  Until then
you will be putting in a lot of time with some generally unpleasant
people. Lee orchestrates all this with the music of the summer of 1997.
He uses the time-tested but hardly original technique of creating
period feel by just finding out what the popular songs stations were
playing and salting them all over the soundtrack.  Sex in the film is
kept frequent, explicit, but using camera angles so that little
explicit is shown to the audience.
     What is disturbing is that Spike Lee's view of the Italian
Americans in this part of New York is not very deep.  If it is beyond
stereotype, it is not by much.  His portrayal is certainly not very
pleasant or understanding.  Lee has, in the past, accused other
filmmakers of using stereotypes.  But it may well instead be a result
of just the same sort of rushed and poorly observed writing that is
starting to appear in his own work.  In fact there have always been
unflattering portraits of non-blacks that he has not written well and
which do not fall far beyond the stereotypical.  During the film he
complains about a double standards toward blacks, but he himself would
complain if another film had black characters so poorly characterized.
     The paranoiac aspects of the film and a good and sympathetic
performance by Mira Sorvino make this otherwise wandering and
pointlessly over-long film considerably more watchable than it would be
otherwise.  And as with DO THE RIGHT THING we do see a good, credible
build of events that make an unthinkable incident believable.  I give
SUMMER OF SAM a 5 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high 0 on the -4 to +4
scale.  Gee, a film about the summer of 1977 and not one mention of
STAR WARS.
